Alaska, session 34, HB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 07 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2027 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Centralized Administrative Services 110,071,300 13,682,400 96,388,900 11 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 12 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of 13 Administration's federally approved cost allocation plans. 14 Office of Administrative 3,696,100 15 Hearings 16 The amount allocated for the Office of Administrative Hearings includes the unexpended and 17 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from reimbursable hearing 18 services, mediation fees, and other fees. 19 Facilities Rent Non-State 1,131,800 20 Owned 21 Office of the Commissioner 904,400 22 Administrative Services 3,219,400 23 Finance 26,330,600 24 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 25 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts and general fund program receipts 26 collected in the Department of Administration's federally approved cost allocation plans, 27 which includes receipts collected in connection with its debt collection activities and from 28 credit card rebates. 29 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Administration submit a 30 decentralization plan for payroll services that accounts for each receiving department's 31 workload, the number and type of positions needed to do the work, and that identifies the 01 funding to cover each department's payroll duties. The plan must include the training and 02 support needed to prepare receiving departments to process payroll without interruption or 03 increased error rates. The plan should be submitted to the Co-chairs of the Finance 04 committees and the Legislative Finance Division by December 1, 2026. 05 Personnel 14,825,600 06 The amount allocated for the Division of Personnel for the Americans with Disabilities Act 07 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts 08 collected for cost allocation of the Americans with Disabilities Act. 09 Retirement and Benefits 24,247,000 10 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 11 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 12 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 13 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 14 Health Plans Administration 35,678,900 15 Labor Agreements 37,500 16 Miscellaneous Items 17 Shared Services of Alaska 18,262,700 9,745,200 8,517,500 18 Accounting 10,752,600 19 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Administration submit a 20 decentralization plan for Shared Services of Alaska that correctly accounts for the changes in 21 interagency charges along with the positions and funding needed for departments to 22 sufficiently complete the work. The plan should be submitted to the Co-chairs of the Finance 23 committees and the Legislative Finance Division by December 1, 2026. 24 Print Services 2,446,900 25 Office of Procurement and 5,063,200 26 Property Management 27 The amount allocated for the Office of Procurement and Property Management includes the 28 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of general fund program receipts from 29 sales of assets through State surplus and other fees. 30 State Facilities Maintenance and 506,200 506,200 31 Operations 01 Facilities Rent State Owned 506,200 02 Public Communications Services 879,500 779,500 100,000 03 Satellite Infrastructure 879,500 04 Office of Information Technology 68,251,900 68,251,900 05 Helpdesk & Enterprise 5,768,100 06 Support 07 Information Technology 6,090,600 08 Strategic Support 09 Licensing, Infrastructure & 45,667,000 10 Servers 11 Chief Information Officer 10,726,200 12 Risk Management 35,236,600 35,236,600 13 Risk Management 35,236,600 14 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 15 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of 16 Administration's federally approved cost allocation plan. 17 Legal and Advocacy Services 88,753,200 85,108,300 3,644,900 18 Office of Public Advocacy 42,262,900 19 Public Defender Agency 46,490,300 20 Alaska Public Offices Commission 1,340,900 1,340,900 21 Alaska Public Offices 1,340,900 22 Commission 23 The amount allocated for the Alaska Public Offices Commission includes the unexpended and 24 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from lobbyist registration fees, 25 civil penalties, late filing fees, and other fees. 26 Motor Vehicles 22,605,100 22,003,600 601,500 27 Motor Vehicles 22,605,100 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 Executive Administration 12,207,200 1,346,800 10,860,400 01 Commissioner's Office 2,314,600 02 Administrative Services 6,748,800 03 Alaska Broadband Office 3,143,800 04 The amount allocated for the Alaska Broadband Office includes the unexpended and 05 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under 06 the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development's federal indirect 07 cost allocation plan for expenditures on the broadband program. 08 Banking and Securities 5,610,500 5,560,500 50,000 09 Banking and Securities 5,610,500 10 Community and Regional Affairs 19,774,100 8,260,800 11,513,300 11 Community and Regional 13,514,700 12 Affairs 13 It is the intent of the legislature that the Division of Community and Regional Affairs develop 14 and execute a grant program for community, tribal, or non-profit organizations. Grants are to 15 be given for community utility disaster and heating assistance that is not otherwise eligible for 16 state or federal emergency financial relief. 17 It is the intent of the legislature that given the high cost of heating fuel in rural communities, 18 Community Assistance Program payments be distributed as quickly as possible following the 19 start of the fiscal year, with priority given first to rural communities and all payments 20 completed no later than August 1, 2026. 21 Serve Alaska 6,259,400 22 Revenue Sharing 22,728,200 22,728,200 23 Payment in Lieu of Taxes 10,428,200 24 (PILT) 25 National Forest Receipts 9,200,000 26 Fisheries Taxes 3,100,000 27 Corporations, Business and 23,389,700 21,978,300 1,411,400 28 Professional Licensing 29 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts collected under AS 08.01.065(a), (c), and (f) - (i). 31 Corporations, Business and 23,389,700 01 Professional Licensing 02 Investments 6,417,100 6,417,100 03 Investments 6,417,100 04 Insurance Operations 9,315,500 8,741,800 573,700 05 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes up to $1,000,000 of the unexpended 06 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Commerce, Community, and 07 Economic Development, Division of Insurance, program receipts from license fees and 08 service fees. 09 Insurance Operations 9,315,500 10 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 9,635,900 9,402,700 233,200 11 Commission 12 Alaska Oil and Gas 9,635,900 13 Conservation Commission 14 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 15 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission receipts 16 account for regulatory cost charges collected under AS 31.05.093. 17 Alcohol and Marijuana Control Office 5,065,000 5,065,000 18 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 19 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Commerce, Community and Economic 20 Development, Alcohol and Marijuana Control Office, program receipts from the licensing and 21 application fees related to the regulation of alcohol and marijuana. 22 Alcohol and Marijuana 5,065,000 23 Control Office 24 Alaska Gasline Development Corporation 2,263,000 2,263,000 25 Alaska Gasline Development 2,263,000 26 Corporation 27 Alaska Energy Authority 23,342,300 6,591,300 16,751,000 28 Railbelt Transmission 1,576,600 29 Organization 30 Alaska Energy Authority 1,199,000 31 Owned Facilities 01 Alaska Energy Authority 14,178,500 02 Rural Energy Assistance 03 Statewide Project 6,388,200 04 Development, Alternative 05 Energy and Efficiency 06 Alaska Industrial Development and 12,776,600 12,776,600 07 Export Authority 08 Alaska Industrial 12,278,100 09 Development and Export 10 Authority 11 Alaska Industrial 498,500 12 Development Corporation 13 Facilities Maintenance 14 Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute 26,626,200 26,626,200 15 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 16 balance on June 30, 2026, of the statutory designated program receipts from the seafood 17 marketing assessment (AS 16.51.120) and other statutory designated program receipts of the 18 Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute. 19 Alaska Seafood Marketing 26,626,200 20 Institute 21 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 11,244,800 11,076,200 168,600 22 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 23 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 24 Development, Regulatory Commission of Alaska receipts account for regulatory cost charges 25 under AS 42.05.254, AS 42.06.286, and AS 42.08.380. 26 Regulatory Commission of 11,244,800 27 Alaska 28 Facility Maintenance and Operations 3,121,300 599,200 2,522,100 29 Facilities Rent State Owned 1,614,500 30 Facilities Rent Non-State 1,506,800 31 Owned 01 * * * * * * * * * * 02 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 Facility Operations and Maintenance 28,568,200 13,758,800 14,809,400 05 24 Hour Institutional 11,882,000 06 Utilities 07 Non-Institutional Utilities 42,500 08 24 Hour Institutional 11,042,200 09 Maintenance 10 Non-Institutional 5,300 11 Maintenance & Operations 12 Non-State Owned Leases 2,000,000 13 Facility-Capital 1,806,300 14 Improvement Unit 15 DOC State Facilities Rent 1,789,900 16 Administration and Support 14,039,500 13,226,100 813,400 17 Office of the Commissioner 2,810,600 18 It is the Intent of the Legislature that the Department of Corrections issue a formal Request 19 for Information (RFI) to solicit and evaluate information from out-of-state private correctional 20 facilities regarding the potential housing of Alaska inmates. The RFI shall seek to identify the 21 number of qualified entities with current capacity and willingness to accept Alaska inmates, 22 including the number of beds available at each facility, the timeframe in which such capacity 23 could be made available, and the inmate classification levels and offense types each entity is 24 willing and authorized to accept, including any exclusions based on custody level, violent 25 offense history, medical or mental health needs, or other eligibility restrictions. 26 The RFI shall also require responding entities to provide comprehensive data sufficient to 27 assess both fiscal impacts and inmate service conditions, including but not limited to: per- 28 inmate daily and annual housing costs; average per-inmate medical and behavioral health care 29 costs; transportation costs associated with transfer and return of inmates; capacity to house 30 Alaska inmates together in a dedicated unit or otherwise separate from inmates from other 31 states; availability and frequency of video visitation and communication access for family 01 contact; opportunities for outdoor recreation and physical activity; inmate work programs; 02 library services; educational, vocational, and rehabilitative programming; and reentry 03 preparation services. 04 The intent of this request is to provide the Legislature with a clear comparative analysis of the 05 total projected cost per inmate, the range of available placement options, inmate eligibility 06 limitations, and the scope and quality of services provided. The Department will submit a 07 report, excluding proprietary information, of collected data to the Co-chairs of the Finance 08 committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by December 1, 2026. 09 Administrative Services 6,054,500 10 Information Technology MIS 4,044,200 11 Research and Records 1,130,200 12 Population Management 361,054,000 351,625,300 9,428,700 13 Peer Support and Wellness 535,900 14 Program 15 Recruitment and Retention 847,500 16 Correctional Academy 2,205,600 17 Institution Director's 22,798,600 18 Office 19 Classification and Furlough 1,751,800 20 Out-of-State Contractual 300,000 21 Inmate Transportation 3,604,600 22 Point of Arrest 628,700 23 Anchorage Correctional 43,655,300 24 Complex 25 The amount allocated for the Anchorage Correctional Complex includes the unexpended and 26 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of federal receipts received by the Department of 27 Corrections through manday billings. 28 Anvil Mountain Correctional 10,046,800 29 Center 30 Combined Hiland Mountain 20,669,200 31 Correctional Center 01 Fairbanks Correctional 17,359,500 02 Center 03 Goose Creek Correctional 56,129,800 04 Center 05 Ketchikan Correctional 6,810,500 06 Center 07 Lemon Creek Correctional 16,030,200 08 Center 09 Matanuska-Susitna 9,495,100 10 Correctional Center 11 Palmer Correctional Center 19,022,200 12 Spring Creek Correctional 29,023,200 13 Center 14 Wildwood Correctional 21,189,500 15 Center 16 Yukon-Kuskokwim 13,644,100 17 Correctional Center 18 Point MacKenzie 6,548,300 19 Correctional Farm 20 Probation and Parole 1,692,600 21 Director's Office 22 Pre-Trial Services 18,471,700 23 Statewide Probation and 22,001,400 24 Parole 25 Regional and Community 14,500,000 26 Jails 27 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Corrections provides funding 28 consistent with the budgets submitted by local police departments for the Regional and 29 Community Jails program. The current formula does not fully cover the expense local 30 governments incur providing jail services to the state or account for the cost savings they 31 provide for the Department of Public Safety. Therefore, the Department shall negotiate the 01 contract amounts with each community, or their representative, for all the Regional and 02 Community Jails. The negotiated contract amount shall be based on the local government's 03 annual standardized budget request. The Department shall use the sum of the contract 04 amounts as the fiscal year 2028 budget request for the Regional and Community Jails 05 program. 06 Parole Board 2,091,900 07 Community Residential Centers 19,818,200 19,818,200 08 Community Residential 19,818,200 09 Centers 10 Electronic Monitoring 3,156,100 3,156,100 11 Electronic Monitoring 3,156,100 12 The amount allocated for Electronic Monitoring includes the unexpended and unobligated 13 balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from electronic monitoring fees. 14 Health and Rehabilitation Services 90,608,600 83,426,300 7,182,300 15 Health and Rehabilitation 1,882,800 16 Director's Office 17 Physical Health Care 76,287,900 18 Behavioral Health Care 4,095,800 19 Substance Abuse Treatment 4,254,200 20 Program 21 Sex Offender Management 3,163,600 22 Program 23 Domestic Violence Program 175,000 24 Reentry Unit 749,300 25 Offender Habilitation 1,663,800 1,507,500 156,300 26 Education Programs 1,057,800 27 Vocational Education 606,000 28 Programs 29 Recidivism Reduction Grants 1,770,200 770,200 1,000,000 30 Recidivism Reduction Grants 1,770,200 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 02 * * * * * * * * * * 03 K-12 Aid to School Districts 20,791,000 20,791,000 04 Foundation Program 20,791,000 05 K-12 Support 12,749,000 12,749,000 06 Residential Schools Program 7,607,600 07 Youth in Detention 1,100,000 08 Special Schools 4,041,400 09 Education Support and Admin Services 318,714,800 72,491,700 246,223,100 10 Executive Administration 1,939,700 11 Administrative Services 2,915,400 12 Information Services 2,047,200 13 Broadband Assistance Grants 20,587,300 14 School Finance & Facilities 3,074,900 15 Child Nutrition 77,482,400 16 Student and School 176,633,400 17 Achievement 18 Career and Technical 7,785,900 19 Education 20 Teacher Certification 988,700 21 The amount allocated for Teacher Certification includes the unexpended and unobligated 22 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Education and Early Development receipts 23 from teacher certification fees under AS 14.20.020(c). 24 Early Learning Coordination 19,060,000 25 Pre-Kindergarten Grants 6,199,900 26 Alaska State Council on the Arts 4,239,300 927,500 3,311,800 27 Alaska State Council on the 4,239,300 28 Arts 29 Commissions and Boards 301,400 301,400 30 Professional Teaching 301,400 31 Practices Commission 01 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 17,465,000 7,079,100 10,385,900 02 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 03 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected by Mt. Edgecumbe High School, 04 not to exceed the amount authorized in AS 14.17.505(a). 05 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 15,555,200 06 Mt. Edgecumbe Aquatic 614,100 07 Center 08 The amount allocated for Mt. Edgecumbe Aquatic Center includes the unexpended and 09 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from aquatic center fees. 10 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 1,295,700 11 Facility Operations and 12 Maintenance State Owned 13 Facility Maintenance and Operations 497,800 497,800 14 Facilities Rent State Owned 497,800 15 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department not enter into new leases, expand office 16 space, or otherwise incur new facilities costs. 17 Alaska State Libraries, Archives and 12,637,800 10,723,900 1,913,900 18 Museums 19 Library Operations 6,388,400 20 Archives 1,780,400 21 Museum Operations 2,719,200 22 The amount allocated for Museum Operations includes the unexpended and unobligated 23 balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from museum gate receipts. 24 Online with Libraries (OWL) 510,500 25 Andrew P. Kashevaroff 1,239,300 26 Facility Operations and 27 Maintenance State Owned 28 Alaska Commission on Postsecondary 17,239,300 5,930,700 11,308,600 29 Education 30 Program Administration & 12,099,200 31 Operations 01 WWAMI Medical Education 5,140,100 02 Alaska Student Loan Corporation 11,158,500 11,158,500 03 Loan Servicing 11,158,500 04 Student Financial Aid Programs 30,461,700 30,461,700 05 Alaska Performance 20,307,800 06 Scholarship Awards 07 Alaska Education Grants 10,153,900 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 * * * * * Department of Environmental Conservation * * * * * 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 Administration 14,634,500 4,538,900 10,095,600 12 Office of the Commissioner 1,307,700 13 Administrative Services 8,090,500 14 The amount allocated for Administrative Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 15 balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 16 Department of Environmental Conservation's federal approved indirect cost allocation plan 17 for expenditures incurred by the Department of Environmental Conservation. 18 State Support Services 2,236,300 19 Facilities Rent Non-State 3,000,000 20 Owned 21 Environmental Health 32,749,900 15,756,300 16,993,600 22 Environmental Health 31,857,300 23 Facilities Operations and 892,600 24 Maintenance State Owned 25 Air Quality 16,179,700 4,620,000 11,559,700 26 Air Quality 16,179,700 27 The amount allocated for Air Quality includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on 28 June 30, 2026, of the Department of Environmental Conservation, Division of Air Quality 29 general fund program receipts from fees collected under AS 46.14.240 and AS 46.14.250. 30 Spill Prevention and Response 26,043,200 16,435,100 9,608,100 31 Spill Prevention and 26,013,200 01 Response 02 SPAR Facilities Rent State 30,000 03 Owned 04 Water 32,560,700 9,036,900 23,523,800 05 The amount allocated for the Division of Water includes the unexpended and unobligated 06 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Environmental Conservation, Division of 07 Water general fund program receipts from fees collected under AS 37.10.052 and AS 08 44.46.025 for plan review of wastewater treatment and disposal systems, authorization for 09 discharges under general wastewater permits, fees for individual wastewater discharge 10 permits; and fees for other regulatory services related to wastewater treatment and disposal. 11 Water Quality, 32,560,700 12 Infrastructure Support & 13 Financing 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Family and Community Services, 18 up to $5,000,000 may be transferred among appropriations in the Department of Family and 19 Community Services, with the exception that no transfers may be made out of the Office of 20 Children's Services. 21 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department shall submit a report of transfers between 22 appropriations that occurred during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to the Co-chairs of 23 the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by September 30, 2027. 24 Alaska Pioneer Homes 124,275,100 72,378,600 51,896,500 25 Alaska Pioneer Homes 39,264,300 26 Payment Assistance 27 Alaska Pioneer Homes 2,028,400 28 Management 29 Pioneer Homes 71,221,900 30 The amount allocated for Pioneer Homes includes the unexpended and unobligated balance 31 on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Family and Community Services, Pioneer Homes care 01 and support receipts under AS 47.55.030. 02 Facility Rent, Operations, 11,760,500 03 and Maintenance 04 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 44,726,000 7,109,900 37,616,100 05 Alaska Psychiatric 42,318,500 06 Institute 07 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,407,500 08 and Maintenance 09 Children's Services 211,236,700 127,546,200 83,690,500 10 It is the intent of the legislature that the Office of Children's Services shall demonstrate its 11 efforts to support Kinship Home Placement and comply with Alaska law requiring 12 supervisors to document that a diligent search has been made for relatives and family friends, 13 and if that search has not been made the supervisor will make sure it is completed in the 14 shortest time feasible. Further, OCS shall submit a report on the rate of family/relative 15 placements, progress in increasing such placements, and its plan to further increase those 16 placements in the future, to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative 17 Finance Division by February 1, 2027. 18 It is the intent of the legislature that the Office of Children's Services engage in a public 19 education campaign regarding safe surrender laws in this state and expressly inform the public 20 that a parent seeking to surrender a child under the age of 21 days can call 911 and surrender 21 the child directly to emergency services. 22 Tribal Child Welfare 5,000,000 23 Compact 24 Children's Services 11,450,800 25 Management 26 Children's Services 1,770,700 27 Training 28 Front Line Social Workers 83,076,900 29 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Family and Community Services 30 submit a report on the implementation of retention bonuses for each fiscal year, including 31 eligibility criteria, number of retention bonuses awarded, and the Department's assessment of 01 the impact of the bonuses, including the underlying data for that assessment to the Co-chairs 02 of the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by February 1, 2027. This 03 intent applies to retention bonuses funded through appropriations in the FY2027 budget. 04 It is the intent of the legislature that the Office of Children's Services (OCS) target its 05 recruitment to fill Protective Services Specialist (PSS) positions at the highest authorized job 06 class for a given PCN. 07 It is the intent of the legislature that OCS should seek to fill 75% or more PSS positions at 08 Level 3 and 25% or fewer at Level 2. 09 It is the intent of the legislature that OCS hire at the PSS 1 level only if OCS cannot fill 10 positions as directed here. 11 It is the intent of the legislature that OCS shall submit to the Co-chairs of the Finance 12 committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by February 1, 2027 a report with the 13 following information: what actions were taken to recruit PSS 3s in and out of state; how 14 many employees in each job class were hired, and for each job class, how many hires had a 15 bachelor's degree and how many had a master's degree; and for those without a degree, how 16 many had paid prior work experience in the field of foster care or in social service work with 17 children and families; and, the annual turnover and caseloads for each level of PSS employed 18 by OCS as a caseworker. 19 Family Preservation 22,789,100 20 Foster Care Base Rate 23,385,900 21 Foster Care Augmented Rate 4,323,900 22 Foster Care Special Need 9,324,700 23 Subsidized Adoptions & 47,118,500 24 Guardianship 25 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,996,200 26 and Maintenance 27 Juvenile Justice 71,070,000 68,785,200 2,284,800 28 McLaughlin Youth Center 20,102,400 29 Mat-Su Youth Facility 3,227,400 30 Kenai Peninsula Youth 2,591,900 31 Facility 01 Fairbanks Youth Facility 5,016,600 02 Bethel Youth Facility 6,715,200 03 Johnson Youth Center 5,385,400 04 Probation Services 20,873,900 05 Delinquency Prevention 716,000 06 Youth Courts 470,500 07 Juvenile Justice Health 1,488,600 08 Care 09 Facility Rent, Operations, 4,482,100 10 and Maintenance 11 Departmental Support Services 33,997,200 13,246,000 20,751,200 12 Coordinated Health and 9,991,700 13 Complex Care 14 Information Technology 9,117,200 15 Services 16 Public Affairs 1,158,400 17 Commissioner's Office 2,483,200 18 Administrative Services 8,455,100 19 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,791,600 20 and Maintenance 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 The amount appropriated for the Department of Fish and Game includes the unexpended and 25 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts collected under the Department of Fish and 26 Game's federal indirect cost plan for expenditures incurred by the Department of Fish and 27 Game. 28 Commercial Fisheries 97,638,700 67,581,000 30,057,700 29 The amount appropriated for Commercial Fisheries includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Fish and Game receipts from commercial 31 fisheries test fishing operations receipts under AS 16.05.050(a)(14), and from commercial 01 crew member licenses. 02 Southeast Region Fisheries 22,044,000 03 Management 04 Central Region Fisheries 14,157,800 05 Management 06 AYK Region Fisheries 13,065,100 07 Management 08 Westward Region Fisheries 17,603,500 09 Management 10 Statewide Fisheries 25,259,100 11 Management 12 Commercial Fisheries Entry 4,495,300 13 Commission 14 The amount allocated for Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission includes the unexpended 15 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Fish and Game, Commercial 16 Fisheries Entry Commission program receipts from licenses, permits and other fees. 17 Comm Fish Facility 911,900 18 Operations and Maintenance 19 State Owned 20 Comm Fish Facility 102,000 21 Operations and Maintenance 22 Non-State Owned 23 Sport Fisheries 48,702,900 1,987,900 46,715,000 24 Sport Fisheries 48,445,200 25 Sport Fish Facility 237,700 26 Operations and Maintenance 27 State Owned 28 Sport Fish Facility 20,000 29 Operations and Maintenance 30 Non-State Owned 31 Anchorage and Fairbanks Hatcheries 7,539,600 5,323,600 2,216,000 01 Anchorage and Fairbanks 4,867,000 02 Hatcheries 03 Hatcheries Facility 2,672,600 04 Operations and Maintenance 05 State Owned 06 Southeast Hatcheries 1,354,800 1,047,900 306,900 07 Southeast Hatcheries 1,354,800 08 Wildlife Conservation 72,813,300 3,334,200 69,479,100 09 Wildlife Conservation 70,539,900 10 Hunter Education Public 1,853,400 11 Shooting Ranges 12 Wildlife Cons. Facility 400,000 13 Operations and Maintenance 14 State Owned 15 Wildlife Cons. Facility 20,000 16 Operations and Maintenance 17 Non-State Owned 18 Statewide Support Services 36,034,500 5,082,800 30,951,700 19 Commissioner's Office 1,646,400 20 Administrative Services 17,422,700 21 Boards of Fisheries and 1,486,400 22 Game 23 Advisory Committees 584,700 24 EVOS Trustee Council 2,405,300 25 Statewide Support Services 7,000,000 26 Facilities Rent State Owned 27 Statewide Support Services 1,000,000 28 Facilities Rent Non-State 29 Owned 30 Statewide Support Services 373,400 31 Facility Operations and 01 Maintenance State Owned 02 Statewide Support Services 102,000 03 Facility Operations and 04 Maintenance Non-State Owned 05 State Facilities 4,013,600 06 Maintenance and Operations 07 Habitat 6,865,700 4,403,700 2,462,000 08 Habitat 6,851,700 09 Habitat Facility Operations 14,000 10 and Maintenance Non-State 11 Owned 12 Subsistence Research & Monitoring 8,063,700 3,548,900 4,514,800 13 State Subsistence Research 8,049,700 14 Subsistence Facility 14,000 15 Operations and Maintenance 16 Non-State Owned 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * Office of the Governor * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 Executive Operations 7,847,300 7,626,200 221,100 21 Executive Office 7,389,000 22 Governor's House 413,500 23 Facilities Operations and 44,800 24 Maintenance State Owned 25 Facilities Rent 1,436,800 1,436,800 26 Facilities Rent State Owned 946,200 27 Facilities Rent Non-State 490,600 28 Owned 29 Lieutenant Governor 1,540,000 1,540,000 30 Lieutenant Governor 1,540,000 31 Office of Management and Budget 3,769,700 3,769,700 01 Office of Management and 3,769,700 02 Budget 03 Elections 7,170,600 6,945,500 225,100 04 Elections 7,170,600 05 Commissions/Special Offices 3,098,300 2,940,700 157,600 06 Human Rights Commission 3,098,300 07 The amount allocated for Human Rights Commission includes the unexpended and 08 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Office of the Governor, Human Rights 09 Commission federal receipts. 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Health, up to $5,000,000 may be 14 transferred among appropriations in the Department of Health with the exception that no 15 transfers may be made out of Medicaid Services. 16 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department shall submit a report of transfers between 17 appropriations that occurred during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to the Co-chairs of 18 the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by September 30, 2027. 19 Behavioral Health 43,292,800 7,015,500 36,277,300 20 Behavioral Health Treatment 16,384,600 21 and Recovery Grants 22 Alcohol Safety Action 4,685,000 23 Program (ASAP) 24 Behavioral Health 19,232,700 25 Administration 26 Behavioral Health 1,777,400 27 Prevention and Early 28 Intervention Grants 29 Alaska Mental Health Board 118,700 30 and Advisory Board on 31 Alcohol and Drug Abuse 01 Suicide Prevention Council 30,000 02 Residential Child Care 1,064,400 03 Health Care Services 29,169,300 12,451,400 16,717,900 04 Health Facilities Licensing 4,288,400 05 and Certification 06 The amount allocated for Health Facilities Licensing and Certification includes the 07 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of general fund program receipts 08 collected for biennial license fees issued under AS 47.32.050. 09 Residential Licensing 6,060,900 10 Medical Assistance 18,646,700 11 Administration 12 Health Care Services 173,300 13 Facility Operations and 14 Maintenance 15 Public Assistance 379,745,400 168,631,000 211,114,400 16 Alaska Temporary Assistance 18,577,300 17 Program 18 Adult Public Assistance 52,781,300 19 Child Care Benefits 72,258,400 20 General Relief Assistance 2,605,400 21 Tribal Assistance Programs 17,042,000 22 Permanent Fund Dividend 17,791,500 23 Hold Harmless 24 Energy Assistance Program 24,123,400 25 Public Assistance 20,556,300 26 Administration 27 Public Assistance Field 106,553,200 28 Services 29 Fraud Investigation 2,664,900 30 Quality Control 3,256,700 31 Work Services 10,918,900 01 Women, Infants and Children 28,022,900 02 Public Assistance Facility 2,593,200 03 Operations and Maintenance 04 Public Health 153,435,200 69,596,600 83,838,600 05 Nursing 29,253,500 06 Women, Children and Family 15,614,100 07 Health 08 Public Health 8,172,600 09 Administrative Services 10 Emergency Programs 18,412,600 11 Chronic Disease Prevention 28,471,100 12 and Health Promotion 13 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 14 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Tobacco Use Education and Cessation Fund under AS 15 37.05.580. 16 Epidemiology 24,237,100 17 Bureau of Vital Statistics 6,059,800 18 Emergency Medical Services 3,183,700 19 Grants 20 State Medical Examiner 4,502,700 21 Public Health Laboratories 9,952,100 22 Public Health Facility 5,575,900 23 Operations and Maintenance 24 Senior and Disabilities Services 67,438,400 39,517,900 27,920,500 25 Senior and Disabilities 25,042,100 26 Community Based Grants 27 Early Intervention/Infant 1,859,100 28 Learning Programs 29 Senior and Disabilities 27,392,300 30 Services Administration 31 General Relief/Temporary 10,536,700 01 Assisted Living 02 Commission on Aging 268,300 03 Governor's Council on 1,502,000 04 Disabilities and Special 05 Education 06 Senior and Disabilities 837,900 07 Services Facility 08 Operations and Maintenance 09 Senior Benefits Payment Program 25,404,500 25,404,500 10 Senior Benefits Payment 25,404,500 11 Program 12 Departmental Support Services 47,655,200 12,201,900 35,453,300 13 Public Affairs 2,297,900 14 Quality Assurance and Audit 1,340,200 15 Commissioner's Office 4,618,100 16 Administrative Support 11,556,600 17 Services 18 Information Technology 20,693,800 19 Services 20 Rate Review 3,523,600 21 Department Support Services 3,625,000 22 Facility Operations and 23 Maintenance 24 Human Services Community Matching 1,387,000 1,387,000 25 Grant 26 Human Services Community 1,387,000 27 Matching Grant 28 Community Initiative Matching Grants 861,700 861,700 29 Community Initiative 861,700 30 Matching Grants (non- 31 statutory grants) 01 Medicaid Services 3,413,341,500 722,683,700 2,690,657,800 02 Medicaid Services 3,386,337,000 03 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Health augment the rates for 04 adolescent behavioral health treatment services provided by Level 3 residential programs as 05 certified by the American Society of Addiction Medicine to reflect the additional costs of 06 caring for youth. 07 No money appropriated in this appropriation may be expended for an abortion that is not a 08 mandatory service required under AS 47.07.030(a). The money appropriated for the 09 Department of Health may be expended only for mandatory services required under Title XIX 10 of the Social Security Act, unless a U.S. Supreme Court decision provides new precedent, and 11 for optional services offered by the state under the state plan for medical assistance that has 12 been approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. 13 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Health increase the rate per service 14 increment of private duty nursing services from $20.00 to $30.00 for Registered Nurses, and 15 from $18.75 to $26.25 for Licensed Practical or Vocational Nurses. 16 Adult Preventative Dental 27,004,500 17 Medicaid Svcs 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 Commissioner and Administrative 35,526,900 8,702,500 26,824,400 22 Services 23 Technology Services 6,449,500 24 Commissioner's Office 1,308,300 25 Workforce Investment Board 14,225,300 26 Alaska Labor Relations 664,600 27 Agency 28 Office of Citizenship 478,900 29 Assistance 30 Management Services 5,458,100 31 The amount allocated for Management Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 01 balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 02 Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 03 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 04 Leasing 1,987,500 05 Labor Market Information 4,954,700 06 Workers' Compensation 14,465,700 14,465,700 07 Workers' Compensation 8,731,500 08 The amount allocated for Workers' Compensation includes the unexpended and unobligated 09 balance on June 30, 2026, of Workers' Safety and Compensation Administration Account 10 receipts collected for annual services fees and civil penalties issued under AS 23.05.067. 11 Workers' Compensation 518,300 12 Appeals Commission 13 Workers' Compensation 811,200 14 Benefits Guaranty Fund 15 Second Injury Fund 2,915,900 16 Fishermen's Fund 1,488,800 17 Labor Standards and Safety 13,639,500 8,962,700 4,676,800 18 Wage and Hour 3,149,300 19 Administration 20 The amount allocated for the Wage and Hour Administration includes the unexpended and 21 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Labor and Workforce 22 Development, Wage and Hour Administration receipts under AS 36.05.045. 23 Mechanical Inspection 4,058,200 24 Occupational Safety and 6,140,400 25 Health 26 Alaska Safety Advisory 291,600 27 Program 28 The amount allocated for the Alaska Safety Advisory Program includes the unexpended and 29 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Labor and Workforce 30 Development, Alaska Safety Advisory Program receipts under AS 18.60.840. 31 Employment and Training Services 56,640,500 5,033,400 51,607,100 01 Employment and Training 2,300,300 02 Services Administration 03 The amount allocated for Employment and Training Services Administration includes the 04 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years 05 collected under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost 06 plan for expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 07 Workforce Services 27,439,300 08 Unemployment Insurance 26,900,900 09 Vocational Rehabilitation 31,753,400 5,364,600 26,388,800 10 Vocational Rehabilitation 1,366,700 11 Administration 12 The amount allocated for Vocational Rehabilitation Administration includes the unexpended 13 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected 14 under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 15 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 16 Client Services 20,568,100 17 Disability Determination 6,836,700 18 Special Projects 2,981,900 19 Alaska Vocational Technical Center 16,348,100 10,177,900 6,170,200 20 Alaska Vocational Technical 13,362,500 21 Center 22 The amount allocated for the Alaska Vocational Technical Center includes the unexpended 23 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of contributions received by the Alaska Vocational 24 Technical Center receipts under AS 21.96.070, AS 43.20.014, AS 43.55.019, AS 43.56.018, 25 AS 43.65.018, AS 43.75.018, and AS 43.77.045 and receipts collected under AS 37.05.146. 26 State Facilities 2,985,600 27 Maintenance and Operations 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 Criminal Division 61,829,700 55,577,800 6,251,900 01 First Judicial District 3,999,500 02 Second Judicial District 4,078,300 03 Third Judicial District: 12,917,300 04 Anchorage 05 Third Judicial District: 10,082,600 06 Outside Anchorage 07 Fourth Judicial District 10,422,600 08 Criminal Justice Litigation 6,553,300 09 Criminal Appeals/Special 13,776,100 10 Litigation 11 Civil Division 66,518,100 33,668,000 32,850,100 12 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 13 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of Law's 14 federally approved cost allocation plan. 15 Deputy Attorney General's 1,559,900 16 Office 17 Civil Defense Litigation 4,847,600 18 Government Services 5,073,800 19 Health, Safety & Welfare 13,860,400 20 Labor, Business & 8,929,600 21 Corporations 22 Legal Support Services 14,762,000 23 Resource Development & 11,385,500 24 Infrastructure 25 Special Litigation & 6,099,300 26 Appeals 27 The amount allocated for Special Litigation and Appeals includes the unexpended and 28 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of designated program receipts of the Department of 29 Law, Special Litigation and Appeals, that are required by the terms of a settlement or 30 judgment to be spent by the state for consumer education or consumer protection. 31 Administration and Support 10,774,400 3,465,200 7,309,200 01 Office of the Attorney 1,011,100 02 General 03 Administrative Services 4,108,500 04 Facility Operations and 42,900 05 Maintenance State Owned 06 Facilities Rent State Owned 1,053,400 07 Facility Operations and 335,500 08 Maintenance Non-State Owned 09 Facilities Rent Non-State 4,223,000 10 Owned 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 Military and Veterans' Affairs 59,498,900 18,855,500 40,643,400 15 Office of the Commissioner 7,982,300 16 Homeland Security and 10,827,300 17 Emergency Management 18 Army Guard Facilities 16,011,400 19 Maintenance 20 Alaska Wing Civil Air 250,000 21 Patrol 22 Air Guard Facilities 8,230,800 23 Maintenance 24 Alaska Military Youth 12,762,500 25 Academy 26 Veterans' Services 2,821,500 27 State Active Duty 525,000 28 Facilities Rent - Non State 88,100 29 Owned 30 Alaska Aerospace Corporation 10,548,900 10,548,900 31 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 01 balance on June 30, 2026, of the federal and corporate receipts of the Department of Military 02 and Veterans' Affairs, Alaska Aerospace Corporation. 03 Alaska Aerospace 3,921,100 04 Corporation 05 Alaska Aerospace 6,627,800 06 Corporation Facilities 07 Maintenance 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 Administration & Support Services 37,718,100 20,921,700 16,796,400 12 Commissioner's Office 2,294,300 13 Office of Project 7,860,700 14 Management & Permitting 15 Administrative Services 4,894,500 16 The amount allocated for Administrative Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 17 balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 18 Department of Natural Resource's federal indirect cost plan for expenditures incurred by the 19 Department of Natural Resources. 20 Information Resource 4,484,300 21 Management 22 Interdepartmental 1,516,900 23 Chargebacks 24 State Facilities 11,176,900 25 Maintenance and Operations 26 Recorder's Office/Uniform 4,568,900 27 Commercial Code 28 The amount allocated for Recorder's Office/Uniform Commercial Code includes the 29 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Natural 30 Resources, Recorder's Office, program receipts from the fees collected to support the 31 maintenance and creation of the permanent public record for commerce in Alaska. 01 Public Information Center 921,600 02 Oil & Gas 24,855,300 11,526,600 13,328,700 03 Oil & Gas 24,855,300 04 The amount allocated for Oil & Gas includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on 05 June 30, 2026, not to exceed $7,000,000, of the revenue from the Right-of-Way leases. 06 Fire Suppression, Land & Water 106,532,200 76,562,300 29,969,900 07 Resources 08 Mining, Land & Water 37,860,700 09 The amount allocated for Mining, Land and Water includes the unexpended and unobligated 10 balance on June 30, 2026, not to exceed $5,000,000, of the receipts collected under AS 11 38.05.035(a)(5). 12 Forest Management & 11,289,200 13 Development 14 The amount allocated for Forest Management and Development includes the unexpended and 15 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the timber receipts account (AS 38.05.110). 16 Geological & Geophysical 23,106,300 17 Surveys 18 The amount allocated for Geological & Geophysical Surveys includes the unexpended and 19 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 41.08.045. 20 Fire Suppression 34,276,000 21 Preparedness 22 Agriculture 9,868,800 5,429,300 4,439,500 23 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 24 balance on June 30, 2026, of registration and endorsement fees, fines, and penalties under AS 25 03.05.076. 26 Agricultural Development 5,987,000 27 The amount allocated for Agricultural Development includes the unexpended and unobligated 28 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected by the Department of Natural Resources 29 under AS 37.05.142, AS 37.05.144, and AS 37.05.146 for agricultural development. 30 North Latitude Plant 3,881,800 31 Material Center 01 Parks & Outdoor Recreation 27,728,900 16,955,600 10,773,300 02 Parks Management & Access 21,072,100 03 The amount allocated for Parks Management and Access includes the unexpended and 04 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 41.21.026. 05 Office of History and 6,656,800 06 Archaeology 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Fire and Life Safety 7,992,300 7,008,900 983,400 11 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 12 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 18.70.080(b), AS 18.70.350(4), 13 AS 18.70.360, AS 18.72.011(b), and AS 18.74.080, in accordance with AS 18.74.210. 14 Fire and Life Safety 7,546,600 15 Alaska Fire Standards 400,700 16 Council 17 FLS Facility Maintenance 45,000 18 and Operations 19 Alaska State Troopers 224,522,700 203,912,500 20,610,200 20 Special Projects 7,464,500 21 Alaska Bureau of Highway 2,391,300 22 Patrol 23 Alaska Bureau of Judicial 5,703,900 24 Services 25 Prisoner Transportation 2,496,700 26 Search and Rescue 243,000 27 Rural Trooper Housing 5,903,200 28 Dispatch Services 8,831,900 29 Statewide Drug and Alcohol 11,536,000 30 Enforcement Unit 31 Alaska State Trooper 100,289,800 01 Detachments 02 Training Academy Recruit 2,076,200 03 Salaries 04 Alaska Bureau of 20,869,100 05 Investigation 06 Aircraft Section 10,924,600 07 Alaska Wildlife Troopers 34,046,700 08 Alaska Wildlife Troopers 5,009,000 09 Marine Enforcement 10 AST Facility Maintenance 6,736,800 11 and Operations 12 Village Public Safety Operations 27,751,400 27,726,400 25,000 13 Village Public Safety 27,747,300 14 Operations 15 VPSO Facility Maintenance 4,100 16 and Operations 17 Alaska Police Standards Council 2,195,100 2,195,100 18 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 19 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 12.25.195(c), AS 12.55.039, AS 20 28.05.151, and AS 29.25.074 and receipts collected under AS 18.65.220(7). 21 Alaska Police Standards 2,166,100 22 Council 23 APSC Facility Maintenance 29,000 24 and Operations 25 Integrated Victim Assistance 38,178,000 21,337,400 16,840,600 26 Council on Domestic 32,318,300 27 Violence and Sexual Assault 28 Violent Crimes Compensation 2,747,200 29 Board 30 Victim Services 3,020,200 31 Administration and Support 01 IVA Facility Maintenance 92,300 02 and Operations 03 Statewide Support 62,654,800 43,206,200 19,448,600 04 Commissioner's Office 5,060,500 05 Training Academy 4,586,900 06 The amount allocated for the Training Academy includes the unexpended and unobligated 07 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 44.41.020(a). 08 Administrative Services 6,453,100 09 Alaska Public Safety 10,170,800 10 Communication Services 11 (APSCS) 12 Information Systems 5,507,100 13 Criminal Justice 16,407,000 14 Information Systems Program 15 The amount allocated for the Criminal Justice Information Systems Program includes the 16 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected by the 17 Department of Public Safety from the Alaska automated fingerprint system under AS 18 44.41.025(b). 19 Laboratory Services 11,282,700 20 SWS Facility Maintenance 3,186,700 21 and Operations 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 It is the intent of the legislature that the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation decommission 26 the Anchorage office and not establish or maintain any new office locations without 27 corresponding budget increments for that purpose. It is the further intent of the legislature that 28 the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation shall provide a report to the Co-chairs of the Finance 29 Committees and the Legislative Finance Division by February 17, 2027, that details any 30 actual expenditures to date related to the Anchorage office. 31 Taxation and Treasury 94,557,000 25,940,600 68,616,400 01 Tax Division 22,082,800 02 Treasury Division 13,279,800 03 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 04 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 05 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 06 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 07 Unclaimed Property 804,800 08 Alaska Retirement 12,329,000 09 Management Board 10 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 11 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 12 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 13 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 14 Alaska Retirement 35,000,000 15 Management Board Custody 16 and Management Fees 17 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 18 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 19 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 20 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 21 Permanent Fund Dividend 11,060,600 22 Division 23 The amount allocated for the Permanent Fund Dividend includes the unexpended and 24 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected by the Department of Revenue 25 for application fees for reimbursement of the cost of the Permanent Fund Dividend Division 26 charitable contributions program as provided under AS 43.23.130(f) and for coordination fees 27 provided under AS 43.23.130(m). 28 Child Support Enforcement 30,989,600 10,068,100 20,921,500 29 Child Support Enforcement 30,989,600 30 Division 31 The amount allocated for the Child Support Enforcement Division includes the unexpended 01 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected by the Department of 02 Revenue associated with collections for recipients of Temporary Assistance to Needy 03 Families and the Alaska Interest program. 04 Administration and Support 9,274,300 2,426,300 6,848,000 05 Commissioner's Office 1,634,200 06 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Revenue work with the Department of 07 Law and the Federal Internal Revenue Service to seek a tax exemption for the energy relief 08 payment portion of the 2026 Permanent Fund Dividend, consistent with the tax-exempt status 09 of the 2022 energy relief payment. 10 Administrative Services 3,739,300 11 The amount allocated for the Administrative Services Division includes the unexpended and 12 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, not to exceed $300,000, of receipts collected by the 13 department's federally approved indirect cost allocation plan. 14 Criminal Investigations 1,527,800 15 Unit 16 State Facilities Rent 2,373,000 17 Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 542,300 542,300 18 Mental Health Trust 16,500 19 Operations 20 Long Term Care Ombudsman 493,100 21 Office 22 Long Term Care Ombudsman 32,700 23 Office Facilities Rent 24 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority 1,421,700 1,421,700 25 AMBBA Operations 1,421,700 26 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 132,683,700 465,400 132,218,300 27 AHFC Operations 130,211,500 28 Alaska Corporation for 530,500 29 Affordable Housing 30 Alaska Sustainable Energy 465,400 31 Corporation 01 Facilities Operations and 1,476,300 02 Maintenance 03 Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 167,638,400 167,638,400 04 Investment Management Fees 05 APFC Investment Management 167,638,400 06 Fees 07 Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 30,530,100 30,530,100 08 Juneau Office Operations 09 Alaska Permanent Fund 29,915,100 10 Corporation Juneau Office 11 Operations 12 Facilities Rent Non-State 615,000 13 Owned 14 Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 1,000 1,000 15 Anchorage Office Operations 16 APFC Anchorage Office 1,000 17 Operations 18 APFC Information Technology and 11,945,600 11,945,600 19 Software Licensing 20 APFC Information Technology 11,945,600 21 and Software Licensing 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Division of Facilities Services 112,761,000 23,184,400 89,576,600 26 The amount allocated for this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated balance 27 on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and 28 Public Facilities for the maintenance and operations of facilities and leases. 29 Facilities Services 62,122,000 30 Leases 50,639,000 31 Administration and Support 60,114,600 13,351,400 46,763,200 01 Data Modernization & 5,762,300 02 Innovation Office 03 Commissioner's Office 3,104,800 04 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 05 review and update as necessary the DOT&PF standard specification related to the use of rigid 06 insulation board in road construction. The update shall be aligned with conclusions and 07 recommendations from the University of Alaska Fairbanks science and evidence-based 08 research, as well as relevant research from industry. DOT&PF shall present any policy change 09 to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees and to the Legislative Finance Division by 10 December 1st, 2026. 11 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department repair and maintain the block wall along 12 Muldoon Road and that, the department submit a report to the co-chairs of the House and 13 Senate Transportation Committees, to the Co-chairs of the Finance committees, and to the 14 Legislative Finance Division by December 1st, 2026, detailing the status of these repairs and 15 maintenance, any agreements with the Municipality of Anchorage or other community 16 partners to facilitate these repairs and maintenance, and plans for ongoing maintenance. 17 Contracting and Appeals 459,000 18 Equal Employment and Civil 1,593,200 19 Rights 20 The amount allocated for Equal Employment and Civil Rights includes the unexpended and 21 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the statutory designated program receipts collected 22 for the Alaska Construction Career Day events. 23 Internal Review 862,700 24 Statewide Administrative 14,316,600 25 Services 26 The amount allocated for Statewide Administrative Services includes the unexpended and 27 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under 28 the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities' federal indirect cost plan for 29 expenditures incurred by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities. 30 Highway Safety Office 2,318,100 31 Information Systems and 7,498,500 01 Services 02 Leased Facilities 2,937,500 03 Statewide Procurement 3,496,400 04 Statewide Aviation 5,761,100 05 The amount allocated for Statewide Aviation includes the unexpended and unobligated 06 balance on June 30, 2026, of the rental receipts and user fees collected from tenants of land 07 and buildings at Department of Transportation and Public Facilities rural airports under AS 08 02.15.090(a). 09 Program Development and 2,781,200 10 Statewide Planning 11 Measurement Standards & 9,223,200 12 Commercial Vehicle 13 Compliance 14 The amount allocated for Measurement Standards and Commercial Vehicle Compliance 15 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Unified Carrier 16 Registration Program receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public 17 Facilities. 18 The amount allocated for Measurement Standards and Commercial Vehicle Compliance 19 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts 20 collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities. 21 Design, Engineering and Construction 149,127,700 3,287,500 145,840,200 22 Central Design, 58,327,600 23 Engineering, and 24 Construction 25 The amount allocated for Central Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes the 26 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the general fund program receipts 27 collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or lease of 28 excess right-of-way. 29 Southcoast Design, 23,405,100 30 Engineering, and 31 Construction 01 The amount allocated for Southcoast Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes 02 the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the general fund program 03 receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or 04 lease of excess right-of-way. 05 Northern Region Design, 44,993,200 06 Engineering, and 07 Construction 08 The amount allocated for Northern Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes 09 the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the general fund program 10 receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or 11 lease of excess right-of-way. 12 Design, Engineering, and 7,017,200 13 Construction Support 14 Services 15 Project Delivery 15,384,600 16 State Equipment Fleet 40,974,900 31,700 40,943,200 17 State Equipment Fleet 40,974,900 18 Highways, Aviation and Facilities 181,074,000 135,928,400 45,145,600 19 The amounts allocated for highways and aviation shall lapse into the general fund on August 20 31, 2027. 21 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 22 balance on June 30, 2026, of general fund program receipts collected by the Department of 23 Transportation and Public Facilities for collections related to the repair of damaged state 24 highway infrastructure. 25 Abandoned Vehicle Removal 100,000 26 Statewide Contracted Snow 915,500 27 Removal 28 Traffic Signal Management 2,389,100 29 Statewide Guardrail and 1,768,900 30 Roadside Hardware Repair 31 Statewide Wayside 420,000 01 Maintenance 02 Central Region Highways and 47,916,700 03 Aviation 04 Northern Region Highways 83,853,300 05 and Aviation 06 Southcoast Region Highways 28,338,100 07 and Aviation 08 Highways and Aviation 6,388,500 09 Support Services 10 Whittier Access and Tunnel 8,983,900 11 The amount allocated for Whittier Access and Tunnel includes the unexpended and 12 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Whittier Tunnel toll receipts collected by the 13 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS 19.05.040(11). 14 International Airports 132,665,200 132,665,200 15 International Airport 11,960,600 16 Systems Office 17 Anchorage Airport 5,854,200 18 Administration 19 Anchorage Airport 30,605,900 20 Facilities 21 Anchorage Airport Field and 26,967,400 22 Equipment Maintenance 23 Anchorage Airport 10,019,300 24 Operations 25 Anchorage Airport Safety 20,424,400 26 Fairbanks Airport 3,319,200 27 Administration 28 Fairbanks Airport 4,779,600 29 Facilities 30 Fairbanks Airport Field and 7,534,800 31 Equipment Maintenance 01 Fairbanks Airport 2,438,800 02 Operations 03 Fairbanks Airport Safety 8,761,000 04 * * * * * * * * * * 05 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 University of Alaska 1,156,371,000 675,989,300 480,381,700 08 Budget Reductions/Additions 64,427,400 09 - Systemwide 10 Systemwide Services 41,628,400 11 Systemwide Services 3,678,800 12 Facility Operations and 13 Maintenance State Owned 14 Office of Information 23,472,800 15 Technology 16 Anchorage Campus 249,704,500 17 Anchorage Campus Facility 25,986,000 18 Operations and Maintenance 19 State Owned 20 Small Business Development 4,479,600 21 Center 22 Kenai Peninsula College 15,561,000 23 Kenai Peninsula College 1,923,800 24 Facility Operations and 25 Maintenance State Owned 26 Kodiak College 5,075,200 27 Kodiak College Facility 900,300 28 Operations and Maintenance 29 State Owned 30 Matanuska-Susitna College 12,909,900 31 Matanuska-Susitna College 1,483,000 01 Facility Operations and 02 Maintenance State Owned 03 Prince William Sound 5,361,500 04 College 05 Prince William Sound 1,366,800 06 College Facility Operations 07 and Maintenance State Owned 08 Troth Yeddha' Campus 472,927,800 09 Troth Yeddha' Campus 109,626,100 10 Facility Operations and 11 Maintenance State Owned 12 College of Indigenous 8,479,500 13 Studies 14 College of Indigenous 731,700 15 Studies Facility Operations 16 and Maintenance State Owned 17 Bristol Bay Campus 3,819,900 18 Bristol Bay Campus Facility 325,000 19 Operations and Maintenance 20 State Owned 21 Chukchi Campus 2,054,300 22 Chukchi Campus Facility 232,700 23 Operations and Maintenance 24 State Owned 25 Kuskokwim Campus 5,605,700 26 Kuskokwim Campus Facility 442,600 27 Operations and Maintenance 28 State Owned 29 Northwest Campus 4,487,700 30 Northwest Campus Facility 289,900 31 Operations and Maintenance 01 State Owned 02 UAF Community and Technical 16,800,900 03 College 04 UAF Community & Technical 1,411,500 05 College Facility Operations 06 & Maintenance State Owned 07 Education Trust of Alaska 9,619,900 08 Juneau Campus 43,147,700 09 Juneau Campus Facility 5,268,400 10 Operations and Maintenance 11 State Owned 12 Ketchikan Campus 4,876,800 13 Ketchikan Campus Facility 559,500 14 Operations and Maintenance 15 State Owned 16 Sitka Campus 6,096,200 17 Sitka Campus Facility 1,608,200 18 Operations and Maintenance 19 State Owned 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Alaska Court System 151,862,800 148,626,800 3,236,000 24 Appellate Courts 10,428,100 25 Trial Courts 126,194,700 26 Administration and Support 15,240,000 27 Therapeutic Courts 4,710,100 3,589,100 1,121,000 28 Therapeutic Courts 4,710,100 29 Commission on Judicial Conduct 603,200 603,200 30 Commission on Judicial 603,200 31 Conduct 01 Judicial Council 1,719,800 1,719,800 02 Judicial Council 1,719,800 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 * * * * * Legislature * * * * * 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 Budget and Audit Committee 21,384,200 21,384,200 07 Legislative Audit 8,548,500 08 Legislative Finance 9,891,100 09 Budget and Audit Committee 2,944,600 10 Expenses 11 It is the Intent of the Legislature that the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee issue a 12 Request for Proposals (RFP) to procure an independent third-party study to identify, evaluate, 13 and analyze the primary cost drivers within the Department of Corrections. The purpose of the 14 study is to provide the Legislature with an objective, comprehensive assessment of the factors 15 contributing to departmental expenditures, to identify opportunities for cost savings, and to 16 inform policy and budget decisions for long-term fiscal sustainability. 17 The study shall include, but not be limited to, an examination of personnel costs, including 18 wages, benefits, vacancy rates, overtime expenditures, and contractual labor obligations; 19 inmate medical and behavioral health care costs; relevant inmate transportation costs; facility 20 operating expenses; and any other significant expenditure categories identified by the 21 independent contractor during the course of the review. 22 Upon completion the Committee will share the findings with the Co-chairs of the Finance 23 committees and the Legislative Finance Division. 24 Legislative Council 34,510,600 34,229,200 281,400 25 Administrative Services 9,163,800 26 Council and Subcommittees 784,700 27 Legal and Research Services 7,116,900 28 Select Committee on Ethics 382,900 29 Office of Victims' Rights 1,532,600 30 Ombudsman 1,924,000 31 Legislature State 1,707,100 01 Facilities Rent 02 Technology and Information 10,075,700 03 Services Division 04 Security Services 1,822,900 05 Legislative Operating Budget 41,805,600 41,785,600 20,000 06 Legislators' Salaries and 9,772,300 07 Allowances 08 Legislative Operating 13,807,300 09 Budget 10 Session Expenses 18,226,000 11 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 3 of this Act to the state agencies named and for the 03 purposes set out in the new legislation for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026 and ending 04 June 30, 2027, unless otherwise indicated. The appropriations in this section fund legislation 05 assumed to have passed during the second regular session of the thirty-fourth legislature. If a 06 measure listed in this section fails to pass and its substance is not incorporated in some other 07 measure, or is vetoed by the governor, the appropriation for that measure shall be reduced 08 accordingly. 09 Appropriation 10 HB 10 ADD FACULTY MEMBER UNIV BOARD OF REGENTS 11 University of Alaska 12 University of Alaska 13 Systemwide Services 14 1004 Gen Fund 4,500 15 HB 23 STATE COMMISSION FOR CIVIL RIGHTS 16 Office of the Governor 17 Commissions/Special Offices 18 Human Rights Commission 19 1002 Fed Rcpts 32,000 20 HB 27 MEDICAL MAJOR EMERGENCIES 21 Department of Health 22 Public Health 23 Emergency Programs 24 1002 Fed Rcpts 37,900 25 1003 GF/Match 214,500 26 HB 28 TEACHER/STATE EMPLOYEE STUDENT LOAN PRGRM 27 Department of Education and Early Development 28 Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education 29 Program Administration & Operations 30 1226 High Ed 1,045,000 31 Fund Capitalization 01 No Further Appropriation Required 02 Public Education Fund 03 1004 Gen Fund 9,932,800 04 HB 48 CIVIL LEGAL SERVICES FUND 05 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 06 Community and Regional Affairs 07 Community and Regional Affairs 08 1221 Legal Serv 459,500 09 Fund Transfers 10 Designated General Fund Transfers 11 Civil Legal Services Fund 12 1272 FTDesigRev 459,500 13 HB 52 MINORS & PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS 14 Department of Health 15 Health Care Services 16 Health Facilities Licensing and Certification 17 1004 Gen Fund 225,800 18 HB 73 COMPLEX CARE RESIDENTIAL HOMES 19 Department of Health 20 Behavioral Health 21 Behavioral Health Administration 22 1002 Fed Rcpts 82,300 23 1003 GF/Match 82,300 24 HB 78 RETIREMENT SYSTEMS; DEFINED BENEFIT OPT. 25 Department of Administration 26 Centralized Administrative Services 27 Retirement and Benefits 28 1004 Gen Fund 130,300 29 1017 Group Ben 335,800 30 1023 FICA Acct 5,800 31 1029 PERS Trust 487,000 01 1034 Teach Ret 176,000 02 1045 Nat Guard 9,700 03 HB 96 HOME CARE EMPLOYMENT STANDARDS ADV BOARD 04 Department of Health 05 Senior and Disabilities Services 06 Senior and Disabilities Services Administration 07 1004 Gen Fund 206,600 08 HB 110 SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT 09 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 10 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 11 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 12 1156 Rcpt Svcs 70,500 13 Department of Public Safety 14 Statewide Support 15 Criminal Justice Information Systems Program 16 1004 Gen Fund 176,400 17 HB 133 PAYMENT OF CONTRACTS 18 Department of Health 19 Health Care Services 20 Medical Assistance Administration 21 1002 Fed Rcpts 46,900 22 1003 GF/Match 46,900 23 Public Assistance 24 Public Assistance Administration 25 1002 Fed Rcpts 51,600 26 1003 GF/Match 42,200 27 Public Health 28 Public Health Administrative Services 29 1002 Fed Rcpts 10,300 30 1003 GF/Match 83,500 31 Departmental Support Services 01 Administrative Support Services 02 1002 Fed Rcpts 18,800 03 1003 GF/Match 37,500 04 1007 I/A Rcpts 37,500 05 HB 173 OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT 06 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 07 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 08 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 09 1156 Rcpt Svcs 52,700 10 HB 193 UNEMPLOYMENT BENEFITS; PAID PARENT LEAVE 11 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 12 Commissioner and Administrative Services 13 Workforce Investment Board 14 1054 STEP 200,100 15 Workers' Compensation 16 Workers' Compensation 17 1279 ParentLeav 1,475,300 18 Employment and Training Services 19 Unemployment Insurance 20 1279 ParentLeav 765,000 21 HB 195 PHARMACIST PRESCRIPTION AUTHORITY 22 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 23 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 24 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 25 1156 Rcpt Svcs 35,000 26 HB 239 CRIM. NEG. HOMICIDE; FAILURE TO ASSIST 27 Department of Administration 28 Shared Services of Alaska 29 Print Services 30 1004 Gen Fund 123,400 31 Legal and Advocacy Services 01 Office of Public Advocacy 02 1004 Gen Fund 291,700 03 Public Defender Agency 04 1004 Gen Fund 536,000 05 Department of Corrections 06 Administration and Support 07 Office of the Commissioner 08 1004 Gen Fund 168,900 09 Population Management 10 Parole Board 11 1004 Gen Fund 121,100 12 Department of Law 13 Criminal Division 14 Criminal Justice Litigation 15 1004 Gen Fund 441,800 16 Criminal Appeals/Special Litigation 17 1004 Gen Fund 325,900 18 Department of Public Safety 19 Statewide Support 20 Criminal Justice Information Systems Program 21 1004 Gen Fund 144,400 22 Laboratory Services 23 1004 Gen Fund 209,000 24 Judiciary 25 Alaska Court System 26 Trial Courts 27 1004 Gen Fund 369,200 28 HB 246 SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICE AGENCY FUNDING 29 Department of Education and Early Development 30 K-12 Support 31 Special Schools 01 1004 Gen Fund 469,900 02 HB 262 NUMBER OF SUPERIOR COURT JUDGES 03 Judiciary 04 Alaska Court System 05 Trial Courts 06 1004 Gen Fund 775,500 07 HB 280 APPORTION TAXABLE INCOME 08 Department of Revenue 09 Taxation and Treasury 10 Tax Division 11 1004 Gen Fund 321,700 12 HB 314 ARCH, ENG, SURVEYORS; REG INT DESIGN 13 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 14 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 15 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 16 1156 Rcpt Svcs 175,600 17 SB 21 AK WORK & SAVE PROGRM 18 Department of Revenue 19 Taxation and Treasury 20 Treasury Division 21 1004 Gen Fund 660,000 22 SB 23 CIVICS EDUCATION 23 Department of Education and Early Development 24 Education Support and Admin Services 25 Student and School Achievement 26 1004 Gen Fund 58,000 27 SB 29 BIG GAME COMMERCIAL SERVICES BOARD 28 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 29 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 30 Corporations, Business and Professional Licensing 31 1156 Rcpt Svcs 46,500 01 SB 41 PUBLIC SCHOOLS: MENTAL HEALTH EDUCATION 02 Department of Education and Early Development 03 Education Support and Admin Services 04 Student and School Achievement 05 1004 Gen Fund 216,000 06 SB 86 MONEY TRANSMISSION; VIRTUAL CURRENCY 07 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 08 Banking and Securities 09 Banking and Securities 10 1005 GF/Prgm 579,000 11 SB 104 VEHICLES/BOATS: TRANSFER ON DEATH TITLE 12 Department of Administration 13 Motor Vehicles 14 Motor Vehicles 15 1005 GF/Prgm 75,000 16 SB 143 SCHOOL BD TERMS, TRAINING; CITY COUNCILS 17 Department of Education and Early Development 18 Education Support and Admin Services 19 Student and School Achievement 20 1004 Gen Fund 200,000 21 SB 146 REAA FUND: MT. EDGECUMBE, TEACHER HOUSING 22 Department of Education and Early Development 23 Education Support and Admin Services 24 School Finance & Facilities 25 1004 Gen Fund 352,300 26 SB 174 INVASIVE SPECIES MANAGEMENT 27 Department of Fish and Game 28 Sport Fisheries 29 Sport Fisheries 30 1004 Gen Fund 84,600 31 *** Total New Legislation Funding *** 23,823,000 01 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 and sec. 2 of this Act. 03 New 04 Funding Source Operating Legislation Total 05 Department of Administration 06 1002 Federal Receipts 649,600 0 649,600 07 1003 General Fund Match 250,000 0 250,000 08 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 96,226,600 1,081,400 97,308,000 09 Receipts 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 36,689,500 75,000 36,764,500 11 1007 Interagency Receipts 81,906,500 0 81,906,500 12 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits 43,563,800 335,800 43,899,600 13 Fund 14 1023 FICA Administration Fund Account 230,700 5,800 236,500 15 1029 Public Employees Retirement 11,142,500 487,000 11,629,500 16 Trust Fund 17 1033 Surplus Federal Property 721,900 0 721,900 18 Revolving Fund 19 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 4,261,100 176,000 4,437,100 20 1042 Judicial Retirement System 127,100 0 127,100 21 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia 314,600 9,700 324,300 22 Retirement System 23 1081 Information Services Fund 68,251,900 0 68,251,900 24 1108 Statutory Designated Program 1,571,600 0 1,571,600 25 Receipts 26 *** Total Agency Funding *** 345,907,400 2,170,700 348,078,100 27 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 28 1002 Federal Receipts 42,673,800 0 42,673,800 29 1003 General Fund Match 1,343,500 0 1,343,500 30 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 14,659,400 0 14,659,400 31 Receipts 01 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 12,855,300 579,000 13,434,300 02 1007 Interagency Receipts 18,341,800 0 18,341,800 03 1036 Commercial Fishing Loan Fund 5,387,200 0 5,387,200 04 1040 Real Estate Recovery Fund 324,800 0 324,800 05 1061 Capital Improvement Project 18,066,800 0 18,066,800 06 Receipts 07 1062 Power Project Loan Fund 1,045,300 0 1,045,300 08 1070 Fisheries Enhancement Revolving 761,700 0 761,700 09 Loan Fund 10 1074 Bulk Fuel Revolving Loan Fund 68,900 0 68,900 11 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & 10,967,500 0 10,967,500 12 Export Authority Receipts 13 1107 Alaska Energy Authority 2,122,500 0 2,122,500 14 Corporate Receipts 15 1108 Statutory Designated Program 14,042,300 0 14,042,300 16 Receipts 17 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 11,076,200 0 11,076,200 18 Receipts 19 1156 Receipt Supported Services 27,898,000 380,300 28,278,300 20 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation 9,402,700 0 9,402,700 21 Commission Receipts 22 1164 Rural Development Initiative 72,400 0 72,400 23 Fund 24 1169 Power Cost Equalization 402,200 0 402,200 25 Endowment Fund 26 1170 Small Business Economic 68,500 0 68,500 27 Development Revolving Loan Fund 28 1202 Anatomical Gift Awareness Fund 80,000 0 80,000 29 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 1,482,300 0 1,482,300 30 1221 Civil Legal Services Fund 306,400 459,500 765,900 31 1223 Commercial Charter Fisheries RLF 23,200 0 23,200 01 1224 Mariculture Revolving Loan Fund 23,600 0 23,600 02 1227 Alaska Microloan Revolving Loan 11,600 0 11,600 03 Fund 04 1277 Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska 9,500 0 9,500 05 Trust Fund 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 193,517,400 1,418,800 194,936,200 07 Department of Corrections 08 1002 Federal Receipts 9,598,600 0 9,598,600 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 480,040,700 290,000 480,330,700 10 Receipts 11 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 7,247,800 0 7,247,800 12 1007 Interagency Receipts 17,172,100 0 17,172,100 13 1171 Restorative Justice Account 6,619,400 0 6,619,400 14 *** Total Agency Funding *** 520,678,600 290,000 520,968,600 15 Department of Education and Early Development 16 1002 Federal Receipts 246,021,300 0 246,021,300 17 1003 General Fund Match 1,401,900 0 1,401,900 18 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 101,396,300 1,296,200 102,692,500 19 Receipts 20 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,076,700 0 2,076,700 21 1007 Interagency Receipts 23,840,200 0 23,840,200 22 1014 Donated Commodity/Handling Fee 542,000 0 542,000 23 Account 24 1043 Federal Impact Aid for K-12 20,791,000 0 20,791,000 25 Schools 26 1106 Alaska Student Loan Corporation 11,158,500 0 11,158,500 27 Receipts 28 1108 Statutory Designated Program 2,709,800 0 2,709,800 29 Receipts 30 1145 Art in Public Places Fund 30,000 0 30,000 31 1226 Alaska Higher Education 36,287,900 1,045,000 37,332,900 01 Investment Fund 02 *** Total Agency Funding *** 446,255,600 2,341,200 448,596,800 03 Department of Environmental Conservation 04 1002 Federal Receipts 45,076,100 0 45,076,100 05 1003 General Fund Match 6,881,500 0 6,881,500 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 16,928,100 0 16,928,100 07 Receipts 08 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 9,064,900 0 9,064,900 09 1007 Interagency Receipts 4,536,100 0 4,536,100 10 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust-- 7,500 0 7,500 11 Civil 12 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention 17,512,700 0 17,512,700 13 & Response Fund 14 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 430,500 0 430,500 15 Waste 16 1061 Capital Improvement Project 7,165,700 0 7,165,700 17 Receipts 18 1093 Clean Air Protection Fund 8,452,500 0 8,452,500 19 1108 Statutory Designated Program 30,000 0 30,000 20 Receipts 21 1166 Commercial Passenger Vessel 1,537,000 0 1,537,000 22 Environmental Compliance Fund 23 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger 2,255,100 0 2,255,100 24 Program 25 1230 Alaska Clean Water 1,146,200 0 1,146,200 26 Administrative Fund 27 1231 Alaska Drinking Water 1,144,100 0 1,144,100 28 Administrative Fund 29 *** Total Agency Funding *** 122,168,000 0 122,168,000 30 Department of Family and Community Services 31 1002 Federal Receipts 86,545,900 0 86,545,900 01 1003 General Fund Match 95,554,800 0 95,554,800 02 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 161,749,300 0 161,749,300 03 Receipts 04 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 31,761,800 0 31,761,800 05 1007 Interagency Receipts 92,996,200 0 92,996,200 06 1061 Capital Improvement Project 799,200 0 799,200 07 Receipts 08 1108 Statutory Designated Program 15,897,800 0 15,897,800 09 Receipts 10 *** Total Agency Funding *** 485,305,000 0 485,305,000 11 Department of Fish and Game 12 1002 Federal Receipts 94,063,800 0 94,063,800 13 1003 General Fund Match 1,348,100 0 1,348,100 14 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 76,975,800 84,600 77,060,400 15 Receipts 16 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,690,000 0 2,690,000 17 1007 Interagency Receipts 27,903,700 0 27,903,700 18 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust-- 2,597,700 0 2,597,700 19 Civil 20 1024 Fish and Game Fund 44,574,300 0 44,574,300 21 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 130,400 0 130,400 22 Waste 23 1061 Capital Improvement Project 6,792,200 0 6,792,200 24 Receipts 25 1108 Statutory Designated Program 10,641,100 0 10,641,100 26 Receipts 27 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 3,803,100 0 3,803,100 28 1201 Commercial Fisheries Entry 7,493,000 0 7,493,000 29 Commission Receipts 30 *** Total Agency Funding *** 279,013,200 84,600 279,097,800 31 Office of the Governor 01 1002 Federal Receipts 157,600 32,000 189,600 02 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 24,258,900 0 24,258,900 03 Receipts 04 1061 Capital Improvement Project 446,200 0 446,200 05 Receipts 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 24,862,700 32,000 24,894,700 07 Department of Health 08 1002 Federal Receipts 2,995,298,700 247,800 2,995,546,500 09 1003 General Fund Match 912,704,900 506,900 913,211,800 10 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 127,231,000 432,400 127,663,400 11 Receipts 12 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 14,264,600 0 14,264,600 13 1007 Interagency Receipts 52,678,100 37,500 52,715,600 14 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 17,791,500 0 17,791,500 15 1061 Capital Improvement Project 2,557,100 0 2,557,100 16 Receipts 17 1108 Statutory Designated Program 33,403,000 0 33,403,000 18 Receipts 19 1168 Tobacco Use Education and 5,330,900 0 5,330,900 20 Cessation Fund 21 1171 Restorative Justice Account 251,400 0 251,400 22 1247 Medicaid Monetary Recoveries 219,800 0 219,800 23 *** Total Agency Funding *** 4,161,731,000 1,224,600 4,162,955,600 24 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 25 1002 Federal Receipts 98,480,200 0 98,480,200 26 1003 General Fund Match 9,463,100 0 9,463,100 27 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 16,444,100 0 16,444,100 28 Receipts 29 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 6,430,100 0 6,430,100 30 1007 Interagency Receipts 15,260,500 0 15,260,500 31 1031 Second Injury Fund Reserve 2,915,900 0 2,915,900 01 Account 02 1032 Fishermen's Fund 1,488,800 0 1,488,800 03 1049 Training and Building Fund 817,600 0 817,600 04 1054 Employment Assistance and 2,490,200 200,100 2,690,300 05 Training Program Account 06 1061 Capital Improvement Project 225,300 0 225,300 07 Receipts 08 1108 Statutory Designated Program 1,577,100 0 1,577,100 09 Receipts 10 1117 Randolph Sheppard Small Business 124,200 0 124,200 11 Fund 12 1151 Technical Vocational Education 735,300 0 735,300 13 Program Account 14 1157 Workers Safety and Compensation 8,673,400 0 8,673,400 15 Administration Account 16 1172 Building Safety Account 2,297,100 0 2,297,100 17 1203 Workers' Compensation Benefits 811,200 0 811,200 18 Guaranty Fund 19 1237 Voc Rehab Small Business 140,000 0 140,000 20 Enterprise Revolving Fund 21 1279 Parental Leave Fund Account 0 2,240,300 2,240,300 22 *** Total Agency Funding *** 168,374,100 2,440,400 170,814,500 23 Department of Law 24 1002 Federal Receipts 2,568,700 0 2,568,700 25 1003 General Fund Match 670,100 0 670,100 26 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 88,898,700 767,700 89,666,400 27 Receipts 28 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 196,300 0 196,300 29 1007 Interagency Receipts 37,412,300 0 37,412,300 30 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 621,000 0 621,000 31 Waste 01 1061 Capital Improvement Project 506,500 0 506,500 02 Receipts 03 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross 3,191,000 0 3,191,000 04 Receipts 05 1108 Statutory Designated Program 2,111,700 0 2,111,700 06 Receipts 07 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 2,851,300 0 2,851,300 08 Receipts 09 1168 Tobacco Use Education and 94,600 0 94,600 10 Cessation Fund 11 *** Total Agency Funding *** 139,122,200 767,700 139,889,900 12 Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs 13 1002 Federal Receipts 36,379,800 0 36,379,800 14 1003 General Fund Match 9,642,000 0 9,642,000 15 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 9,212,400 0 9,212,400 16 Receipts 17 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 1,100 0 1,100 18 1007 Interagency Receipts 7,148,300 0 7,148,300 19 1061 Capital Improvement Project 4,084,800 0 4,084,800 20 Receipts 21 1101 Alaska Aerospace Corporation 2,932,400 0 2,932,400 22 Fund 23 1108 Statutory Designated Program 647,000 0 647,000 24 Receipts 25 *** Total Agency Funding *** 70,047,800 0 70,047,800 26 Department of Natural Resources 27 1002 Federal Receipts 25,890,900 0 25,890,900 28 1003 General Fund Match 2,274,800 0 2,274,800 29 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 72,688,400 0 72,688,400 30 Receipts 31 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 39,198,300 0 39,198,300 01 1007 Interagency Receipts 17,911,700 0 17,911,700 02 1021 Agricultural Revolving Loan Fund 350,600 0 350,600 03 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 52,600 0 52,600 04 Waste 05 1061 Capital Improvement Project 9,043,800 0 9,043,800 06 Receipts 07 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross 7,968,100 0 7,968,100 08 Receipts 09 1108 Statutory Designated Program 13,875,600 0 13,875,600 10 Receipts 11 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 6,101,900 0 6,101,900 12 1154 Shore Fisheries Development 530,900 0 530,900 13 Lease Program 14 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,550,900 0 1,550,900 15 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 8,688,100 0 8,688,100 16 1216 Boat Registration Fees 11,600 0 11,600 17 1236 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas 565,100 0 565,100 18 Project Fund I/A 19 *** Total Agency Funding *** 206,703,300 0 206,703,300 20 Department of Public Safety 21 1002 Federal Receipts 41,397,400 0 41,397,400 22 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 299,008,900 529,800 299,538,700 23 Receipts 24 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 6,377,600 0 6,377,600 25 1007 Interagency Receipts 12,514,800 0 12,514,800 26 1061 Capital Improvement Project 2,449,300 0 2,449,300 27 Receipts 28 1108 Statutory Designated Program 204,400 0 204,400 29 Receipts 30 1171 Restorative Justice Account 251,400 0 251,400 31 1220 Crime Victim Compensation Fund 1,090,500 0 1,090,500 01 *** Total Agency Funding *** 363,294,300 529,800 363,824,100 02 Department of Revenue 03 1002 Federal Receipts 107,179,900 0 107,179,900 04 1003 General Fund Match 9,117,500 0 9,117,500 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 26,287,200 981,700 27,268,900 06 Receipts 07 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 3,077,600 0 3,077,600 08 1007 Interagency Receipts 15,616,300 0 15,616,300 09 1016 CSSD Federal Incentive Payments 2,123,300 0 2,123,300 10 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits 22,589,900 0 22,589,900 11 Fund 12 1027 International Airports Revenue 228,300 0 228,300 13 Fund 14 1029 Public Employees Retirement 16,709,800 0 16,709,800 15 Trust Fund 16 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 7,716,500 0 7,716,500 17 1042 Judicial Retirement System 368,800 0 368,800 18 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia 166,300 0 166,300 19 Retirement System 20 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 11,196,600 0 11,196,600 21 1061 Capital Improvement Project 2,911,900 0 2,911,900 22 Receipts 23 1066 Public School Trust Fund 848,800 0 848,800 24 1103 Alaska Housing Finance 40,228,100 0 40,228,100 25 Corporation Receipts 26 1104 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank 1,316,700 0 1,316,700 27 Receipts 28 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross 209,964,700 0 209,964,700 29 Receipts 30 1108 Statutory Designated Program 355,000 0 355,000 31 Receipts 01 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost 1,160,900 0 1,160,900 02 Reimbursement 03 1226 Alaska Higher Education 418,100 0 418,100 04 Investment Fund 05 1256 Education Endowment Fund 1,500 0 1,500 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 479,583,700 981,700 480,565,400 07 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 08 1002 Federal Receipts 5,607,500 0 5,607,500 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 118,993,200 0 118,993,200 10 Receipts 11 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 8,094,200 0 8,094,200 12 1007 Interagency Receipts 66,207,400 0 66,207,400 13 1026 Highways Equipment Working 41,908,300 0 41,908,300 14 Capital Fund 15 1027 International Airports Revenue 133,574,800 0 133,574,800 16 Fund 17 1061 Capital Improvement Project 219,887,700 0 219,887,700 18 Receipts 19 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System 2,223,000 0 2,223,000 20 Fund 21 1108 Statutory Designated Program 405,200 0 405,200 22 Receipts 23 1147 Public Building Fund 15,889,200 0 15,889,200 24 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 6,669,300 0 6,669,300 25 1214 Whittier Tunnel Toll Receipts 1,849,800 0 1,849,800 26 1215 Unified Carrier Registration 704,200 0 704,200 27 Receipts 28 1239 Aviation Fuel Tax Account 5,003,600 0 5,003,600 29 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 9,611,200 0 9,611,200 30 1245 Rural Airport Receipts I/A 285,100 0 285,100 31 1249 Motor Fuel Tax Receipts 39,803,700 0 39,803,700 01 *** Total Agency Funding *** 676,717,400 0 676,717,400 02 University of Alaska 03 1002 Federal Receipts 229,831,200 0 229,831,200 04 1003 General Fund Match 4,777,300 0 4,777,300 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 360,037,600 4,500 360,042,100 06 Receipts 07 1007 Interagency Receipts 21,116,000 0 21,116,000 08 1048 University of Alaska Restricted 311,173,400 0 311,173,400 09 Receipts 10 1061 Capital Improvement Project 4,181,000 0 4,181,000 11 Receipts 12 1108 Statutory Designated Program 76,632,500 0 76,632,500 13 Receipts 14 1174 University of Alaska Intra- 148,621,000 0 148,621,000 15 Agency Transfers 16 1234 Special License Plates Receipts 1,000 0 1,000 17 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,156,371,000 4,500 1,156,375,500 18 Judiciary 19 1002 Federal Receipts 1,466,000 0 1,466,000 20 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 154,538,900 1,144,700 155,683,600 21 Receipts 22 1007 Interagency Receipts 2,216,700 0 2,216,700 23 1108 Statutory Designated Program 335,000 0 335,000 24 Receipts 25 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost 339,300 0 339,300 26 Reimbursement 27 *** Total Agency Funding *** 158,895,900 1,144,700 160,040,600 28 Legislature 29 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 96,906,500 0 96,906,500 30 Receipts 31 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 492,500 0 492,500 01 1007 Interagency Receipts 35,000 0 35,000 02 1108 Statutory Designated Program 15,000 0 15,000 03 Receipts 04 1171 Restorative Justice Account 251,400 0 251,400 05 *** Total Agency Funding *** 97,700,400 0 97,700,400 06 Fund Capitalization 07 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 0 9,932,800 9,932,800 08 Receipts 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 0 9,932,800 9,932,800 10 Fund Transfers 11 1272 Revenue Designated for Fund 0 459,500 459,500 12 Transfers 13 *** Total Agency Funding *** 0 459,500 459,500 14 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 10,096,249,000 23,823,000 10,120,072,000 15 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 and sec. 2 of this Act. 03 New 04 Funding Source Operating Legislation Total 05 Unrestricted General 06 1003 General Fund Match 1,055,429,500 506,900 1,055,936,400 07 1004 Unrestricted General Fund 2,342,482,000 16,545,800 2,359,027,800 08 Receipts 09 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 3,397,911,500 17,052,700 3,414,964,200 10 Designated General 11 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 180,518,300 654,000 181,172,300 12 1021 Agricultural Revolving Loan Fund 350,600 0 350,600 13 1031 Second Injury Fund Reserve 2,915,900 0 2,915,900 14 Account 15 1032 Fishermen's Fund 1,488,800 0 1,488,800 16 1036 Commercial Fishing Loan Fund 5,387,200 0 5,387,200 17 1040 Real Estate Recovery Fund 324,800 0 324,800 18 1048 University of Alaska Restricted 311,173,400 0 311,173,400 19 Receipts 20 1049 Training and Building Fund 817,600 0 817,600 21 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention 17,512,700 0 17,512,700 22 & Response Fund 23 1054 Employment Assistance and 2,490,200 200,100 2,690,300 24 Training Program Account 25 1062 Power Project Loan Fund 1,045,300 0 1,045,300 26 1070 Fisheries Enhancement Revolving 761,700 0 761,700 27 Loan Fund 28 1074 Bulk Fuel Revolving Loan Fund 68,900 0 68,900 29 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System 2,223,000 0 2,223,000 30 Fund 31 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 3,803,100 0 3,803,100 01 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 13,927,500 0 13,927,500 02 Receipts 03 1151 Technical Vocational Education 735,300 0 735,300 04 Program Account 05 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 6,101,900 0 6,101,900 06 1154 Shore Fisheries Development 530,900 0 530,900 07 Lease Program 08 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,550,900 0 1,550,900 09 1156 Receipt Supported Services 27,898,000 380,300 28,278,300 10 1157 Workers Safety and Compensation 8,673,400 0 8,673,400 11 Administration Account 12 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation 9,402,700 0 9,402,700 13 Commission Receipts 14 1164 Rural Development Initiative 72,400 0 72,400 15 Fund 16 1168 Tobacco Use Education and 5,425,500 0 5,425,500 17 Cessation Fund 18 1169 Power Cost Equalization 402,200 0 402,200 19 Endowment Fund 20 1170 Small Business Economic 68,500 0 68,500 21 Development Revolving Loan Fund 22 1172 Building Safety Account 2,297,100 0 2,297,100 23 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 15,357,400 0 15,357,400 24 1201 Commercial Fisheries Entry 7,493,000 0 7,493,000 25 Commission Receipts 26 1202 Anatomical Gift Awareness Fund 80,000 0 80,000 27 1203 Workers' Compensation Benefits 811,200 0 811,200 28 Guaranty Fund 29 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 1,482,300 0 1,482,300 30 1216 Boat Registration Fees 11,600 0 11,600 31 1221 Civil Legal Services Fund 306,400 459,500 765,900 01 1223 Commercial Charter Fisheries RLF 23,200 0 23,200 02 1224 Mariculture Revolving Loan Fund 23,600 0 23,600 03 1226 Alaska Higher Education 36,706,000 1,045,000 37,751,000 04 Investment Fund 05 1227 Alaska Microloan Revolving Loan 11,600 0 11,600 06 Fund 07 1234 Special License Plates Receipts 1,000 0 1,000 08 1237 Voc Rehab Small Business 140,000 0 140,000 09 Enterprise Revolving Fund 10 1247 Medicaid Monetary Recoveries 219,800 0 219,800 11 1249 Motor Fuel Tax Receipts 39,803,700 0 39,803,700 12 1272 Revenue Designated for Fund 0 459,500 459,500 13 Transfers 14 1277 Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska 9,500 0 9,500 15 Trust Fund 16 1279 Parental Leave Fund Account 0 2,240,300 2,240,300 17 *** Total Designated General *** 710,448,100 5,438,700 715,886,800 18 Other Non-Duplicated 19 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits 66,153,700 335,800 66,489,500 20 Fund 21 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust-- 2,605,200 0 2,605,200 22 Civil 23 1023 FICA Administration Fund Account 230,700 5,800 236,500 24 1024 Fish and Game Fund 44,574,300 0 44,574,300 25 1027 International Airports Revenue 133,803,100 0 133,803,100 26 Fund 27 1029 Public Employees Retirement 27,852,300 487,000 28,339,300 28 Trust Fund 29 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 11,977,600 176,000 12,153,600 30 1042 Judicial Retirement System 495,900 0 495,900 31 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia 480,900 9,700 490,600 01 Retirement System 02 1066 Public School Trust Fund 848,800 0 848,800 03 1093 Clean Air Protection Fund 8,452,500 0 8,452,500 04 1101 Alaska Aerospace Corporation 2,932,400 0 2,932,400 05 Fund 06 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & 10,967,500 0 10,967,500 07 Export Authority Receipts 08 1103 Alaska Housing Finance 40,228,100 0 40,228,100 09 Corporation Receipts 10 1104 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank 1,316,700 0 1,316,700 11 Receipts 12 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross 221,123,800 0 221,123,800 13 Receipts 14 1106 Alaska Student Loan Corporation 11,158,500 0 11,158,500 15 Receipts 16 1107 Alaska Energy Authority 2,122,500 0 2,122,500 17 Corporate Receipts 18 1108 Statutory Designated Program 174,454,100 0 174,454,100 19 Receipts 20 1117 Randolph Sheppard Small Business 124,200 0 124,200 21 Fund 22 1166 Commercial Passenger Vessel 1,537,000 0 1,537,000 23 Environmental Compliance Fund 24 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger 2,255,100 0 2,255,100 25 Program 26 1214 Whittier Tunnel Toll Receipts 1,849,800 0 1,849,800 27 1215 Unified Carrier Registration 704,200 0 704,200 28 Receipts 29 1230 Alaska Clean Water 1,146,200 0 1,146,200 30 Administrative Fund 31 1231 Alaska Drinking Water 1,144,100 0 1,144,100 01 Administrative Fund 02 1239 Aviation Fuel Tax Account 5,003,600 0 5,003,600 03 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 9,611,200 0 9,611,200 04 1256 Education Endowment Fund 1,500 0 1,500 05 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 785,155,500 1,014,300 786,169,800 06 Federal Receipts 07 1002 Federal Receipts 4,068,887,000 279,800 4,069,166,800 08 1014 Donated Commodity/Handling Fee 542,000 0 542,000 09 Account 10 1016 CSSD Federal Incentive Payments 2,123,300 0 2,123,300 11 1033 Surplus Federal Property 721,900 0 721,900 12 Revolving Fund 13 1043 Federal Impact Aid for K-12 20,791,000 0 20,791,000 14 Schools 15 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost 1,500,200 0 1,500,200 16 Reimbursement 17 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 4,094,565,400 279,800 4,094,845,200 18 Other Duplicated 19 1007 Interagency Receipts 514,813,700 37,500 514,851,200 20 1026 Highways Equipment Working 41,908,300 0 41,908,300 21 Capital Fund 22 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 28,988,100 0 28,988,100 23 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous 1,234,500 0 1,234,500 24 Waste 25 1061 Capital Improvement Project 279,117,500 0 279,117,500 26 Receipts 27 1081 Information Services Fund 68,251,900 0 68,251,900 28 1145 Art in Public Places Fund 30,000 0 30,000 29 1147 Public Building Fund 15,889,200 0 15,889,200 30 1171 Restorative Justice Account 7,373,600 0 7,373,600 31 1174 University of Alaska Intra- 148,621,000 0 148,621,000 01 Agency Transfers 02 1220 Crime Victim Compensation Fund 1,090,500 0 1,090,500 03 1236 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas 565,100 0 565,100 04 Project Fund I/A 05 1245 Rural Airport Receipts I/A 285,100 0 285,100 06 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 1,108,168,500 37,500 1,108,206,000 07 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 6 of this Act to the agencies named for the purposes 03 expressed for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026, unless 04 otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Legal and Advocacy Services 50,000 50,000 11 Office of Public Advocacy 50,000 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 Community and Regional Affairs 800,000 800,000 16 Community and Regional 800,000 17 Affairs 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 Alaska Pioneer Homes 5,200,000 5,200,000 22 Alaska Pioneer Homes 5,200,000 23 Payment Assistance 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 Criminal Division 1,500,000 1,500,000 28 First Judicial District 99,300 29 Second Judicial District 78,400 30 Third Judicial District: 365,900 31 Anchorage 01 Third Judicial District: 261,300 02 Outside Anchorage 03 Fourth Judicial District 256,100 04 Criminal Justice Litigation 141,100 05 Criminal Appeals/Special 297,900 06 Litigation 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Village Public Safety Operations 1,250,000 1,250,000 11 Village Public Safety 1,250,000 12 Operations 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 Taxation and Treasury 236,900 236,900 17 Tax Division 236,900 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 * * * * * Legislature * * * * * 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 Legislative Operating Budget 1,000,000 1,000,000 22 Session Expenses 1,000,000 23 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 5 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Administration 05 1002 Federal Receipts 50,000 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 50,000 07 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 08 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 898,700 09 1012 Railbelt Energy Fund -98,700 10 *** Total Agency Funding *** 800,000 11 Department of Family and Community Services 12 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 5,200,000 13 *** Total Agency Funding *** 5,200,000 14 Department of Law 15 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 1,500,000 16 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,500,000 17 Department of Public Safety 18 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 1,250,000 19 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,250,000 20 Department of Revenue 21 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 236,900 22 *** Total Agency Funding *** 236,900 23 Legislature 24 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 1,000,000 25 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,000,000 26 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 10,036,900 27 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 5 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 9,848,700 06 1012 Railbelt Energy Fund -98,700 07 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 9,750,000 08 Designated General 09 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 236,900 10 *** Total Designated General *** 236,900 11 Federal Receipts 12 1002 Federal Receipts 50,000 13 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 50,000 14 (SECTION 8 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 8. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF LAW. (a) The sum of $2,120,251 is 02 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Law, civil division, deputy attorney 03 general's office, for the purpose of paying judgments and settlements against the state for the 04 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 05 (b) The sum of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 06 Law, civil division, civil defense litigation, for ongoing litigation in Vail v. State, for the 07 fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028. 08 * Sec. 9. SUPPLEMENTAL DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. Section 41(g), ch. 10, 09 SLA 2025, is amended to read: 10 (g) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from 11 the specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 12 2026: 13 (1) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 14 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 15 estimated to be $2,259,773, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 16 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 17 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2010B general 18 obligation bonds; 19 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 20 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, after 21 the payment made in (1) of this subsection, estimated to be $144,127, from the general 22 fund for that purpose; 23 (3) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 24 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, 25 estimated to be $434,570, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 26 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 27 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2013A general 28 obligation bonds; 29 (4) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 30 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, after 31 the payments made in (3) of this subsection, estimated to be $26,268, from the general 01 fund for that purpose; 02 (5) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 03 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2015B, 04 estimated to be $9,793,875, from the general fund for that purpose; 05 (6) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 06 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016A, 07 estimated to be $6,247,375, from the general fund for that purpose; 08 (7) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 09 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016B, 10 estimated to be $6,226,875, from the general fund for that purpose; 11 (8) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 12 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, 13 estimated to be $6,971,625, from the general fund for that purpose; 14 (9) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment for 15 arbitrage rebate on State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, estimated 16 to be $4,025,000, from investment earnings on the bond proceeds deposited in the 17 capital project funds for the series 2020A general obligation bonds for that purpose; 18 (10) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 19 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2023A, 20 estimated to be $18,398,750, from the general fund for that purpose; 21 (11) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 22 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024A, 23 estimated to be $5,504,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 24 (12) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 25 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024B, 26 estimated to be $4,135,837 [$4,147,000], from the general fund for that purpose; 27 (13) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 28 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2025A, 29 estimated to be $2,715,892 [$3,956,229], from the general fund for that purpose; 30 (14) the amount necessary for payment of trustee fees on outstanding 31 State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 2013A, 2015B, 2016A, 01 2016B, 2020A, 2023A, 2024A, 2024B, and 2025A, estimated to be $7,500, from the 02 general fund for that purpose; 03 (15) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment to 04 the United States Treasury for arbitrage rebate and payment of tax penalties on 05 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, estimated to be $50,000, from 06 the general fund for that purpose; 07 (16) if the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued are 08 temporarily insufficient to cover costs incurred on projects approved for funding with 09 these proceeds, the amount necessary to prevent this cash deficiency, from the general 10 fund, contingent on repayment to the general fund as soon as additional state general 11 obligation bond proceeds have been received by the state; and 12 (17) if the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 13 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds exceeds the amounts 14 appropriated in this subsection, the additional amount necessary to pay the obligations, 15 from the general fund for that purpose. 16 * Sec. 10. SUPPLEMENTAL FUND CAPITALIZATION. The sum of $982,800 is 17 appropriated to the election fund required by the federal Help America Vote Act from the 18 following sources: 19 (1) $163,800 from the general fund; 20 (2) $819,000 from federal receipts. 21 * Sec. 11. SUPPLEMENTAL FUND TRANSFER. The sum of $351,902 is appropriated 22 from the general fund to the bulk fuel revolving loan fund (AS 42.45.250(a)) for the 23 unincorporated community of Kwigillingok's outstanding principal and interest under the bulk 24 fuel loan program (AS 42.45.260) and the bulk fuel bridge loan program (AS 42.45.270). 25 * Sec. 12. SUPPLEMENTAL RATIFICATION OF CERTAIN EXPENDITURES. The 26 following departmental expenditures made in fiscal years 2023, 2024, and 2025 are ratified to 27 reverse the negative account balances in the Alaska state accounting system in the amount 28 listed for the AR number. The appropriations from which those expenditures were actually 29 paid are amended by increasing those appropriations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 30 by the amount listed, as follows: 31 AGENCY FISCAL YEAR AMOUNT 01 Department of Corrections 02 (1) AR JCIP Facility-Capital 2024 $ 2,413.87 03 Improvement Unit 04 (2) AR JADM Administration and 2024 70,548.28 05 Support 06 (3) AR JPOP Population 2024 12,601,588.11 07 Management 08 (4) AR JPOP Population 2025 12,622,561.03 09 Management 10 (5) AR JELM Electronic 2024 153,359.00 11 Monitoring 12 (6) AR JHRS Health and 2024 1,145,988.85 13 Rehabilitation Services 14 (7) AR JOFH Offender 2024 8,472.64 15 Habilitation 16 (8) AR JRRG Recidivism Reduction 2024 213,105.00 17 Grants 18 Department of Family and Community Services 19 (9) AR K001 Alaska Pioneer 2025 691,937.09 20 Homes 21 Department of Natural Resources 22 (10) AR NPKO Parks and Outdoor 2023 4,137.08 23 Recreation 24 * Sec. 13. SUPPLEMENTAL SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS. Section 49(a), ch. 10, SLA 25 2025, is amended to read: 26 (a) If the actual unrestricted general fund revenue, including the appropriation 27 made in sec. 25(c), ch. 10, SLA 2025 [OF THIS ACT], collected in the fiscal year 28 ending June 30, 2026, as determined by the commissioner of revenue on 29 August 31, 2026, exceeds $6,300,000,000, the amount remaining, after all 30 appropriations have been made that take effect in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 31 of the difference between [$6,300,000,000 AND] the actual unrestricted general fund 01 revenue collected in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, as determined by the 02 commissioner of revenue on August 31, 2026, and $6,300,000,000, not to exceed 03 $700,000,000, is appropriated as follows: 04 (1) the amount necessary, estimated to be $127,340,800, to pay a 05 one-time energy relief payment of $200 as part of the permanent fund dividend 06 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to the dividend fund (AS 43.23.045(a)); 07 (2) after the appropriation made in (1) of this subsection, 08 $115,000,000 to the Department of Education and Early Development to be 09 distributed as grants to school districts according to the average daily 10 membership for each district adjusted under AS 14.17.410(b)(1)(A) - (D) for the 11 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027; 12 (3) after the appropriations made in (1) and (2) of this subsection, 13 $15,000,000 to the bulk fuel revolving loan fund (AS 42.45.250(a)); 14 (4) after the appropriations made in (1) - (3) of this subsection, the 15 remaining amount to the budget reserve fund (AS 37.05.540(a)). 16 * Sec. 14. ALASKA AEROSPACE CORPORATION. Federal receipts and other corporate 17 receipts of the Alaska Aerospace Corporation received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 18 2027, that exceed the amount appropriated in sec. 1 of this Act are appropriated to the Alaska 19 Aerospace Corporation for operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 20 * Sec. 15. ALASKA COURT SYSTEM. The amount necessary, not to exceed $75,000, is 21 appropriated from the general fund to the Judiciary, Commission on Judicial Conduct, for 22 special counsel costs for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 23 * Sec. 16. ALASKA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION. (a) The board of directors of 24 the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation anticipates that $54,275,000 of the adjusted change 25 in net assets from the second preceding fiscal year will be available for appropriation for the 26 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 27 (b) The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation shall retain the amount set out in (a) of 28 this section for the purpose of paying debt service for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, in 29 the estimated amount of $2,500,000 for debt service on the bonds authorized under sec. 4, ch. 30 120, SLA 2004. 31 (c) After deductions for the item set out in (b) of this section and deductions for 01 appropriations for operating and capital purposes are made, any remaining balance of the 02 amount set out in (a) of this section for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to 03 the general fund. 04 (d) All unrestricted mortgage loan interest payments, mortgage loan commitment 05 fees, and other unrestricted receipts received by or accrued to the Alaska Housing Finance 06 Corporation during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and all income earned on assets of 07 the corporation during that period are appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance 08 Corporation to hold as corporate receipts for the purposes described in AS 18.55 and 09 AS 18.56. The corporation shall allocate its corporate receipts between the Alaska housing 10 finance revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund (AS 18.56.710(a)) 11 under procedures adopted by the board of directors. 12 (e) The sum of $800,000,000 is appropriated from the corporate receipts appropriated 13 to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and allocated between the Alaska housing finance 14 revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund (AS 18.56.710(a)) under 15 (d) of this section to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending 16 June 30, 2027, for housing loan programs not subsidized by the corporation. 17 (f) The sum of $30,000,000 is appropriated from the portion of the corporate receipts 18 appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and allocated between the Alaska 19 housing finance revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund 20 (AS 18.56.710(a)) under (d) of this section that is derived from arbitrage earnings to the 21 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for housing 22 loan programs and projects subsidized by the corporation. 23 * Sec. 17. ALASKA INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT AND EXPORT AUTHORITY. (a) 24 The sum of $17,000,000 has been declared available by the Alaska Industrial Development 25 and Export Authority board of directors under AS 44.88.088 for appropriation as the dividend 26 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. After deductions for appropriations for capital 27 purposes are made, any remaining balance of the amount set out in this subsection is 28 appropriated from the unrestricted balance in the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 29 Authority revolving fund (AS 44.88.060), the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 30 Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS 44.88.660), and 31 the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS 44.88.810) to the general fund. 01 (b) All unrestricted loan interest payments, loan commitment fees, and other 02 unrestricted receipts received by or accrued to the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 03 Authority during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and all income earned on assets of the 04 authority during that period are appropriated to the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 05 Authority to hold as corporate receipts for the purposes described in AS 44.88. The authority 06 shall allocate its corporate receipts between the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 07 Authority revolving fund (AS 44.88.060), the Alaska Industrial Development and Export 08 Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS 44.88.660), and 09 the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS 44.88.810) under procedures adopted by the 10 board of directors. 11 * Sec. 18. ALASKA PERMANENT FUND. (a) The amount required to be deposited under 12 art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution of the State of Alaska, estimated to be $323,012,154, during the 13 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to the principal of the Alaska permanent 14 fund in satisfaction of that requirement. 15 (b) The amount necessary, when added to the appropriation made in (a) of this 16 section, to satisfy the deposit described under AS 37.13.010(a)(2), estimated to be 17 $108,646,000, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated from the general 18 fund to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund. 19 (c) The sum of $3,996,865,095 is appropriated from the earnings reserve account 20 (AS 37.13.145) to the general fund. 21 (d) The amount necessary for the payment of a permanent fund dividend of $1,000 to 22 each eligible individual and for administrative and associated costs, estimated to be 23 $674,071,200, is appropriated from the general fund to the dividend fund (AS 43.23.045(a)) 24 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 25 (e) The income earned during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, on revenue from 26 the sources set out in AS 37.13.145(d), estimated to be $26,312,800, is appropriated to the 27 Alaska capital income fund (AS 37.05.565). 28 (f) The amount calculated under AS 37.13.145(c), after the appropriation made in (c) 29 of this section, estimated to be $1,491,000,000, is appropriated from the earnings reserve 30 account (AS 37.13.145) to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund to offset the effect of 31 inflation on the principal of the Alaska permanent fund. 01 (g) The proportional share of investment management costs paid by investments of 02 funds managed by the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation is estimated to be $734,858,000. 03 (h) The amount appropriated from gross receipts of the Alaska permanent fund in sec. 04 1 of this Act includes an estimated amount of $1,825,700 attributed to the mental health trust 05 fund (AS 37.14.031) and an estimated amount of $2,396,000 attributed to the power cost 06 equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)) for the proportional share of investment 07 management costs of the mental health trust fund (AS 37.14.031) and the power cost 08 equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)). 09 * Sec. 19. ALASKA TECHNICAL AND VOCATIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAM 10 ACCOUNT. (a) After the appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act, four percent of the 11 revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and vocational education program account 12 (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $1,073,500, is 13 appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational education program account 14 (AS 23.15.830) to the Department of Education and Early Development for operating 15 expenses of the Galena Interior Learning Academy for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 16 (b) After the appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act, 66 percent of the revenue 17 deposited into the Alaska technical and vocational education program account (AS 23.15.830) 18 in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $17,713,100, is appropriated from the 19 Alaska technical and vocational education program account (AS 23.15.830) to the Department 20 of Labor and Workforce Development for operating expenses of the following institutions, in 21 the following percentages, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 22 ESTIMATED 23 INSTITUTION PERCENTAGE AMOUNT 24 Alaska Technical Center 9 percent $2,415,400 25 Alaska Vocational Technical 17 percent 4,562,500 26 Center 27 Fairbanks Pipeline Training Center 7 percent 1,878,700 28 Ilisagvik College 6 percent 1,610,300 29 Northwestern Alaska Career 4 percent 1,073,500 30 and Technical Center 31 Partners for Progress in Delta, 3 percent 805,100 01 Inc. 02 Prince of Wales Community 5 percent 1,341,900 03 Learning Center 04 Sealaska Heritage Institute, Inc. 2 percent 536,800 05 Southwest Alaska Vocational 4 percent 1,073,500 06 and Education Center 07 Yuut Elitnaurviat - People's 9 percent 2,415,400 08 Learning Center 09 (c) After the appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act, 30 percent of the revenue 10 deposited into the Alaska technical and vocational education program account (AS 23.15.830) 11 in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $8,051,500, is appropriated from the 12 Alaska technical and vocational education program account (AS 23.15.830) to the University 13 of Alaska for operating expenses of the following institutions, in the following percentages, 14 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 15 ESTIMATED 16 INSTITUTION PERCENTAGE AMOUNT 17 University of Alaska 25 percent $6,709,600 18 University of Alaska Southeast 5 percent 1,341,900 19 (d) The unexpended and unobligated balances on June 30, 2027, of the appropriations 20 made in (a) - (c) of this section are appropriated to the unemployment compensation fund 21 (AS 23.20.130). 22 * Sec. 20. BONUSES FOR CERTAIN EMPLOYEES OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH. 23 (a) The money appropriated in this Act includes amounts to implement the payment of 24 bonuses and other monetary terms of letters of agreement entered into between the state and 25 collective bargaining units under AS 23.40.070 - 23.40.260 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 26 2027. 27 (b) The Office of the Governor, office of management and budget, shall 28 (1) not later than 30 days after the Department of Law enters into a letter of 29 agreement described in (a) of this section, provide to the legislative finance division in 30 electronic form 31 (A) a copy of the letter of agreement; and 01 (B) a copy of the cost estimate prepared for the letter of agreement; 02 (2) submit a report to the co-chairs of the finance committee of each house of 03 the legislature and the legislative finance division not later than 04 (A) February 1, 2027, that summarizes all payments made under the 05 letters of agreement described in (a) of this section during the first half of the fiscal 06 year ending June 30, 2027; and 07 (B) September 30, 2027, that summarizes all payments made under the 08 letters of agreement described in (a) of this section during the second half of the fiscal 09 year ending June 30, 2027; and 10 (3) not later than 30 days after a letter of agreement described in (a) of this 11 section terminates, notify the legislative finance division of the termination. 12 * Sec. 21. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. (a) The amount necessary to fund the 13 uses of the state insurance catastrophe reserve account described in AS 37.05.289(a) is 14 appropriated from that account to the Department of Administration for those uses for the 15 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 16 (b) The amount necessary to fund the uses of the working reserve account described 17 in AS 37.05.510(a) is appropriated from that account to the Department of Administration for 18 those uses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 19 (c) The amount necessary to have an unobligated balance of $5,000,000 in the 20 working reserve account described in AS 37.05.510(a) is appropriated from the unexpended 21 and unobligated balance of any appropriation enacted to finance the payment of employee 22 salaries and benefits that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year 23 ending June 30, 2027, to the working reserve account (AS 37.05.510(a)). 24 (d) The amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (c) of this section, to 25 maintain a minimum target claim reserve balance of one and one-half times the amount of 26 outstanding claims in the group health and life benefits fund (AS 39.30.095), not to exceed 27 $18,500,000, is appropriated from the unexpended and unobligated balance of any 28 appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending 29 June 30, 2027, to the group health and life benefits fund (AS 39.30.095). It is the intent of the 30 legislature that the appropriation made in this subsection be used only for costs that the 31 Department of Administration did not anticipate when setting the rate for the employer 01 contribution to the AlaskaCare employee health plan for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 02 It is also the intent of the legislature that the Department of Administration increase the 03 employer contribution to the AlaskaCare employee health plan in the fiscal year ending 04 June 30, 2028, to cover the full actuarial cost of the plan without relying on the funding 05 appropriated in this subsection. 06 (e) The amount necessary to have an unobligated balance of $50,000,000 in the state 07 insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)), after the appropriations made in (c) 08 and (d) of this section, is appropriated from the unexpended and unobligated balance of any 09 appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending 10 June 30, 2027, to the state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)). 11 (f) If the amount necessary to cover plan sponsor costs, including actuarial costs, for 12 retirement system benefit payment calculations exceeds the amount appropriated for that 13 purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, after all allowable payments from retirement system fund 14 sources, that amount, not to exceed $500,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the 15 Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 16 (g) The amount necessary to cover actuarial costs associated with bills in the finance 17 committee of each house of the legislature, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the 18 general fund to the Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending 19 June 30, 2027. 20 * Sec. 22. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 21 DEVELOPMENT. (a) The unexpended and unobligated balance of federal money 22 apportioned to the state as national forest income that the Department of Commerce, 23 Community, and Economic Development determines would lapse into the unrestricted portion 24 of the general fund on June 30, 2027, under AS 41.15.180(j) is appropriated to home rule 25 cities, first class cities, second class cities, a municipality organized under federal law, or 26 regional educational attendance areas entitled to payment from the national forest income for 27 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to be allocated among the recipients of national forest 28 income according to their pro rata share of the total amount distributed under AS 41.15.180(c) 29 and (d) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 30 (b) If the amount necessary to make national forest receipts payments under 31 AS 41.15.180 exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 01 amount necessary to make national forest receipts payments is appropriated from federal 02 receipts received for that purpose to the Department of Commerce, Community, and 03 Economic Development, revenue sharing, national forest receipts allocation, for the fiscal 04 year ending June 30, 2027. 05 (c) If the amount necessary to make payments in lieu of taxes for cities in the 06 unorganized borough under AS 44.33.020(a)(20) exceeds the amount appropriated for that 07 purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the amount necessary to make those payments is appropriated 08 from federal receipts received for that purpose to the Department of Commerce, Community, 09 and Economic Development, revenue sharing, payment in lieu of taxes allocation, for the 10 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 11 (d) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 42.45.085(a), estimated to 12 be $56,067,900, not to exceed the amount described in AS 42.45.085(a), is appropriated from 13 the power cost equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)) to the Department of 14 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy Authority, power cost 15 equalization allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 16 (e) If the appropriation made in (d) of this section is insufficient to fully fund each of 17 the purposes specified in AS 42.45.085(a), the amount of the shortfall, estimated to be 18 $7,975,668, is appropriated from the power cost equalization endowment fund 19 (AS 42.45.070(a)) from the earnings of the fund for the previous closed fiscal year that exceed 20 the appropriation made in (d) of this section. 21 (f) The amount received in settlement of a claim against a bond guaranteeing the 22 reclamation of state, federal, or private land, including the plugging or repair of a well, 23 estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated to the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 24 Commission for the purpose of reclaiming the state, federal, or private land affected by a use 25 covered by the bond for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 26 (g) The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from program receipts received by the 27 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, division of insurance, 28 under AS 21 to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, 29 division of insurance, for actuarial support for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, and 30 June 30, 2028. 31 (h) Forty percent of the boat receipts collected under AS 05.25.096 during the fiscal 01 year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $181,531, not to exceed $200,000, is appropriated 02 to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment as a 03 grant under AS 37.05.316 to the Alaska Marine Safety Education Association for marine 04 safety education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 05 (i) The amount of federal receipts received for the reinsurance program under 06 AS 21.55 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to the Department of 07 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, division of insurance, for the 08 reinsurance program under AS 21.55 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, and June 30, 09 2028. 10 (j) The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department 11 of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for community assistance payments 12 to eligible recipients under the community assistance program for the fiscal year ending 13 June 30, 2027. 14 (k) The amount necessary to make an additional basic community assistance payment 15 to each municipality, reserve, and community that is proportional to the amount each 16 municipality, reserve, and community receives from the state for basic community assistance 17 under AS 29.60.855, estimated to be $20,000,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the 18 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for that purpose for the 19 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 20 (l) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d)(21) during the fiscal year 21 ending June 30, 2026, for the issuance of special request National Rifle Association license 22 plates, estimated to be $7,440, is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 23 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment as a grant under 24 AS 37.05.316 to the Alaska SCTP, non profit corporation, for maintenance of scholastic clay 25 target programs and other youth shooting programs, including travel budgets to compete in 26 national collegiate competitions, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 27 (m) The sum of $300,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 28 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment as a grant under 29 AS 37.05.316 to the Alaska Farmers' Market Association, for the Supplemental Nutrition 30 Assistance Program Market Match, Women, Infants, and Children Farmers Market Nutrition 31 Program, and Senior Farmers Market Nutrition Program for the fiscal years ending June 30, 01 2027, June 30, 2028, and June 30, 2029. 02 * Sec. 23. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND EARLY DEVELOPMENT. (a) Fifty 03 percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 04 2027, estimated to be $467,050, is appropriated to the Department of Education and Early 05 Development to be distributed as grants to school districts according to the average daily 06 membership for each school district, adjusted under AS 14.17.410(b)(1)(A) - (D), for the 07 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 08 (b) Federal funds received by the Department of Education and Early Development, 09 education support and administrative services, that exceed the amount appropriated to the 10 Department of Education and Early Development, education support and administrative 11 services, in sec. 1 of this Act are appropriated to the Department of Education and Early 12 Development, education support and administrative services, for that purpose for the fiscal 13 year ending June 30, 2027. 14 (c) The proceeds from the sale of state-owned Mt. Edgecumbe High School land in 15 Sitka by the Department of Education and Early Development or the Department of Natural 16 Resources are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education and Early 17 Development, Mt. Edgecumbe High School, for maintenance and operations for the fiscal 18 year ending June 30, 2027. 19 (d) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(a)(3) during the fiscal year 20 ending June 30, 2026, for the issuance of celebrating the arts license plates, less the cost of 21 issuing the license plates, estimated to be $80,000, is appropriated from the general fund to 22 the Department of Education and Early Development, Alaska State Council on the Arts, for 23 the purposes described in AS 44.27.050 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 24 (e) The sum of $29,097,565 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department 25 of Education and Early Development for payment as grants under AS 37.05.316 for energy 26 relief for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to the following school districts in the 27 following amounts: 28 SCHOOL DISTRICT AMOUNT 29 Alaska Gateway School District $ 302,371 30 Aleutian Region School District 21,000 31 Aleutians East Borough School District 205,571 01 Anchorage School District 5,539,634 02 Annette Island School District 138,675 03 Bering Strait School District 1,800,830 04 Bristol Bay Borough School District 81,300 05 Chatham School District 104,588 06 Chugach School District 86,083 07 Copper River School District 186,089 08 Cordova City School District 99,000 09 Craig City School District 112,885 10 Delta/Greely School District 261,682 11 Denali Borough School District 140,767 12 Dillingham City School District 184,134 13 Fairbanks North Star Borough School District 2,026,483 14 Galena City School District 596,537 15 Haines Borough School District 79,112 16 Hoonah City School District 62,349 17 Hydaburg City School District 58,206 18 Iditarod Area School District 256,639 19 Juneau Borough School District 532,862 20 Kake City School District 75,538 21 Kashunamiut School District 135,000 22 Kenai Peninsula Borough School District 1,885,478 23 Ketchikan Gateway Borough School District 339,254 24 Klawock City School District 45,909 25 Kodiak Island Borough School District 610,047 26 Kuspuk School District 285,000 27 Lake and Peninsula Borough School District 293,723 28 Lower Kuskokwim School District 2,039,366 29 Lower Yukon School District 1,446,840 30 Matanuska-Susitna Borough School District 2,010,476 31 Mount Edgecumbe 233,046 01 Nenana City School District 66,600 02 Nome Public Schools 470,700 03 North Slope Borough School District 1,019,550 04 Northwest Arctic Borough School District 1,858,680 05 Pelican City School District 6,178 06 Petersburg Borough School District 177,202 07 Pribilof School District 45,605 08 Saint Mary's School District 122,173 09 Sitka School District 324,860 10 Skagway School District 54,814 11 Southeast Island School District 111,415 12 Southwest Region School District 583,632 13 Unalaska City School District 131,953 14 Valdez City School District 274,500 15 Wrangell Public School District 94,400 16 Yakutat School District 31,140 17 Yukon Flats School District 453,135 18 Yukon-Koyukuk School District 590,040 19 Yupiit School District 404,514. 20 * Sec. 24. DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME. The amount of statutory designated 21 program receipts received for fisheries disasters during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 22 estimated to be $0, is appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for fisheries disaster 23 relief for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, June 30, 2028, and June 30, 2029. 24 * Sec. 25. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. (a) Federal receipts received during the fiscal 25 year ending June 30, 2027, for Medicaid services are appropriated to the Department of 26 Health, Medicaid services, for Medicaid services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 27 (b) The amount of federal receipts received from sec. 71401, P.L. 119-21, 139 Stat. 28 327, for the federal rural health transformation program, estimated to be $272,174,856, is 29 appropriated to the Department of Health for that purpose for the fiscal years ending June 30, 30 2027, June 30, 2028, and June 30, 2029. 31 * Sec. 26. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT. (a) If the 01 amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the workers' compensation benefits guaranty 02 fund (AS 23.30.082) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, 03 the additional amount necessary to pay those benefit payments is appropriated for that 04 purpose from the workers' compensation benefits guaranty fund (AS 23.30.082) to the 05 Department of Labor and Workforce Development, workers' compensation benefits guaranty 06 fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 07 (b) If the amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the second injury fund 08 (AS 23.30.040(a)) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 09 additional amount necessary to make those benefit payments is appropriated for that purpose 10 from the second injury fund (AS 23.30.040(a)) to the Department of Labor and Workforce 11 Development, second injury fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 12 (c) If the amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the fishermen's fund 13 (AS 23.35.060) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 14 additional amount necessary to make those benefit payments is appropriated for that purpose 15 from the fishermen's fund (AS 23.35.060) to the Department of Labor and Workforce 16 Development, fishermen's fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 17 (d) If the amount of contributions received by the Alaska Vocational Technical Center 18 under AS 21.96.070, AS 43.20.014, AS 43.55.019, AS 43.56.018, AS 43.65.018, 19 AS 43.75.018, and AS 43.77.045 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, exceeds the 20 amount appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Alaska 21 Vocational Technical Center, in sec. 1 of this Act, the additional contributions are 22 appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Alaska Vocational 23 Technical Center, Alaska Vocational Technical Center allocation, for the purpose of operating 24 the center for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 25 (e) After the appropriation made in sec. 1 of this Act, revenue deposited into the 26 employment assistance and training program account (AS 23.15.625) during the fiscal year 27 ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $8,663,500, is appropriated to the Department of Labor 28 and Workforce Development for operating expenses of the following state employment 29 assistance and training programs, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 30 GRANTEE PROGRAM ESTIMATED AMOUNT 31 Alaska Workforce Investment Board State Training $6,930,800 01 and Employment Program Grantee Program 02 Workforce Services Job Center State Training 1,732,700 03 and Employment Program 04 (f) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2027, of the appropriation 05 made in (e) of this section is appropriated to the unemployment compensation fund 06 (AS 23.20.130). 07 * Sec. 27. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS. (a) Five percent 08 of the average ending market value in the Alaska veterans' memorial endowment fund 09 (AS 37.14.700) for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, 10 estimated to be $8,676, is appropriated from the Alaska veterans' memorial endowment fund 11 (AS 37.14.700) to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs for the purposes specified 12 in AS 37.14.730(b) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 13 (b) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d) during the fiscal year 14 ending June 30, 2027, for the issuance of special request license plates commemorating 15 Alaska veterans, less the cost of issuing the license plates, estimated to be $7,300, is 16 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs for the 17 maintenance, repair, replacement, enhancement, development, and construction of veterans' 18 memorials for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 19 * Sec. 28. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. (a) The interest earned during 20 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, on the reclamation bond posted by Cook Inlet Energy for 21 operation of an oil production platform in Cook Inlet under lease with the Department of 22 Natural Resources, estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated from interest held in the general 23 fund to the Department of Natural Resources for the purpose of the bond for the fiscal year 24 ending June 30, 2027. 25 (b) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 37.14.820 for the fiscal 26 year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $30,000, is appropriated from the mine 27 reclamation trust fund operating account (AS 37.14.800(a)) to the Department of Natural 28 Resources for those purposes for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 29 (c) The amount received in settlement of a claim against a bond guaranteeing the 30 reclamation of state, federal, or private land, including the plugging or repair of a well, 31 estimated to be $50,000, is appropriated to the Department of Natural Resources for the 01 purpose of reclaiming the state, federal, or private land affected by a use covered by the bond 02 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 03 (d) Sixty percent of the boat receipts collected under AS 05.25.096 during the fiscal 04 year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $272,298, not to exceed $300,000, is appropriated 05 to the Department of Natural Resources, division of parks and outdoor recreation, for the 06 boating safety program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 07 * Sec. 29. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. The amount necessary to pay externally 08 managed investment profit sharing fees, estimated to be $13,600,000, is appropriated to the 09 Department of Revenue from the retirement funds managed by the Alaska Retirement 10 Management Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 11 * Sec. 30. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES. (a) The 12 sum of $174,963,000 is appropriated to the Department of Transportation and Public 13 Facilities, Alaska marine highway system, for costs associated with operating the Alaska 14 marine highway system for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, from the 15 following sources: 16 (1) $83,299,600 from federal receipts; 17 (2) $69,866,900 from the general fund; 18 (3) $1,042,200 from capital improvement project receipts; 19 (4) $20,754,300 from the Alaska marine highway system fund 20 (AS 19.65.060(a)). 21 (b) If the amount of federal receipts that are received by the Department of 22 Transportation and Public Facilities during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is less than 23 the amount appropriated in (a) of this section, the amount of the shortfall, estimated to be $0, 24 not to exceed $49,500,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 25 Transportation and Public Facilities, Alaska marine highway system, for operation of marine 26 highway vessels for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 27 * Sec. 31. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. (a) The sum of $2,870,300 is appropriated from 28 the general fund to the Office of the Governor, division of elections, for costs associated with 29 conducting the statewide primary and general elections for the fiscal years ending June 30, 30 2027, and June 30, 2028. 31 (b) After the appropriations made in secs. 21(c) - (e) of this Act, the unexpended and 01 unobligated balance of any appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end 02 of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, not to exceed $2,000,000, is appropriated to the 03 Office of the Governor, office of management and budget, to support the cost of central 04 services agencies that provide services under AS 37.07.080(e)(2) for the fiscal years ending 05 June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, if receipts from approved central services cost allocation 06 methods under AS 37.07.080(e)(2)(B) fall short of the amounts appropriated in this Act. 07 (c) The sum of $7,831,500 is appropriated from the general fund to the Office of the 08 Governor, executive operations, for the period beginning January 1, 2027, and ending 09 June 30, 2027, and is allocated as follows: 10 PURPOSE AMOUNT 11 (1) Executive office $7,168,000 12 (2) Governor's house 413,500 13 (3) Contingency fund 250,000 14 * Sec. 32. UNIVERSITY OF ALASKA. The sum of $15,750,000 is appropriated to the 15 University of Alaska Fairbanks Geophysical Institute Alaska Critical Minerals Collaborative 16 for creation and operation of a critical mineral accelerator program in the state for the fiscal 17 year ending June 30, 2027, from the following sources: 18 (1) $500,000 from the general fund; 19 (2) $250,000 from university receipts; 20 (3) $15,000,000 from federal receipts received for that purpose. 21 * Sec. 33. BANKCARD SERVICE FEES. (a) The amount necessary to compensate the 22 collector or trustee of fees, licenses, taxes, or other money belonging to the state during the 23 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated for that purpose for the fiscal year ending 24 June 30, 2027, to the agency authorized by law to generate the revenue, from the funds and 25 accounts in which the payments received by the state are deposited. In this subsection, 26 "collector or trustee" includes vendors retained by the state on a contingency fee basis. 27 (b) The amount necessary to compensate the provider of bankcard or credit card 28 services to the state during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated for that 29 purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to each agency of the executive, legislative, 30 and judicial branches that accepts payment by bankcard or credit card for licenses, permits, 31 goods, and services provided by that agency on behalf of the state, from the funds and 01 accounts in which the payments received by the state are deposited. 02 * Sec. 34. DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The amount required to be paid by the 03 state for the principal of and interest on all issued and outstanding state-guaranteed bonds, 04 estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the Alaska Housing Finance 05 Corporation for payment of the principal of and interest on those bonds for the fiscal year 06 ending June 30, 2027. 07 (b) The amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption premium, 08 and trustee fees, if any, on bonds issued by the state bond committee under AS 37.15.560 for 09 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $2,093,900, is appropriated from interest 10 earnings of the Alaska clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) to the Alaska clean water fund 11 revenue bond redemption fund (AS 37.15.565). 12 (c) The amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption premium, 13 and trustee fees, if any, on bonds issued by the state bond committee under AS 37.15.560 for 14 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $2,186,200, is appropriated from interest 15 earnings of the Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) to the Alaska drinking water 16 fund revenue bond redemption fund (AS 37.15.565). 17 (d) The sum of $2,587,792 is appropriated from the general fund to the following 18 agencies for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for payment of debt service on outstanding 19 debt authorized by AS 14.40.257, AS 29.60.700, and AS 42.45.065, respectively, for the 20 following projects: 21 AGENCY AND PROJECT APPROPRIATION AMOUNT 22 (1) University of Alaska $1,222,365 23 Anchorage Community and Technical 24 College Center 25 Juneau Readiness Center/UAS Joint Facility 26 (2) Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 27 (A) Aleutians East Borough/False Pass 218,946 28 small boat harbor 29 (B) Aleutians East Borough/Akutan 91,828 30 small boat harbor 31 (C) Fairbanks North Star Borough 347,310 01 Eielson AFB Schools, major 02 maintenance and upgrades 03 (D) City of Unalaska Little South America 367,389 04 (LSA) Harbor 05 (3) Alaska Energy Authority 339,954 06 Copper Valley Electric Association 07 cogeneration projects 08 (e) The amount necessary for payment of lease payments and trustee fees relating to 09 certificates of participation issued for real property for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 10 estimated to be $2,889,150, is appropriated from the general fund to the state bond committee 11 for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 12 (f) The sum of $3,303,500 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 13 Administration for the purpose of paying the obligation of the Linny Pacillo Parking Garage 14 in Anchorage to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 15 2027. 16 (g) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from the 17 specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 18 (1) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 19 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, estimated to be 20 $1,889,033 from the amount received from the United States Treasury as a result of the 21 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School Construction Bond 22 interest subsidy payments due on the series 2010B general obligation bonds; 23 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 24 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, after the payment made in 25 (1) of this subsection, estimated to be $15,121,717, from the general fund for that purpose; 26 (3) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 27 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, estimated to be $434,571, 28 from the amount received from the United States Treasury as a result of the American 29 Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School Construction Bond interest 30 subsidy payments due on the series 2013A general obligation bonds; 31 (4) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 01 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, after the payments made 02 in (3) of this subsection, estimated to be $26,268, from the general fund for that purpose; 03 (5) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 04 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, estimated to be 05 $6,905,125, from the general fund for that purpose; 06 (6) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 07 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024A, estimated to be 08 $8,063,375, from the general fund for that purpose; 09 (7) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 10 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024B, estimated to be 11 $11,332,750, from the general fund for that purpose; 12 (8) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 13 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2025A, estimated to be 14 $19,317,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 15 (9) the amount necessary for payment of trustee fees on outstanding State of 16 Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 2013A, 2020A, 2024A, 2024B, and 2025A, 17 estimated to be $7,500, from the general fund for that purpose; 18 (10) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment to the 19 United States Treasury for arbitrage rebate and payment of tax penalties on outstanding State 20 of Alaska general obligation bonds, estimated to be $50,000, from the general fund for that 21 purpose; 22 (11) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment for 23 arbitrage rebate on international airports revenue bonds, estimated to be $1,500,000, from 24 investment earnings on the bond proceeds deposited in construction funds and the reserve 25 funds of the international airports for that purpose; and 26 (12) if investment earnings on the bond proceeds deposited in construction 27 funds and the reserve funds of the international airports are insufficient for payment of 28 arbitrage rebate on international airports revenue bonds, the amount necessary to maintain 29 sufficiency of the reserve fund requirement, after the payment made in (11) of this subsection, 30 estimated to be $100,000, from the International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) 31 for that purpose. 01 (13) if the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued are temporarily 02 insufficient to cover costs incurred on projects approved for funding with these proceeds, the 03 amount necessary to prevent this cash deficiency, from the general fund, contingent on 04 repayment to the general fund as soon as additional state general obligation bond proceeds 05 have been received by the state; and 06 (14) if the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest 07 on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds exceeds the amounts appropriated in 08 this subsection, the additional amount necessary to pay the obligations, from the general fund 09 for that purpose. 10 (h) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from the 11 specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 12 (1) the amount necessary for debt service on outstanding international airports 13 revenue bonds, estimated to be $2,500,000, from the collection of passenger facility charges 14 approved by the Federal Aviation Administration at the Alaska international airport system; 15 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and trustee fees on 16 outstanding international airports revenue bonds, after the payment made in (1) of this 17 subsection, estimated to be $22,869,800, from the International Airports Revenue Fund 18 (AS 37.15.430(a)) for that purpose; and 19 (3) the amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption 20 premiums, and trustee fees, if any, associated with the early redemption of international 21 airports revenue bonds authorized under AS 37.15.410 - 37.15.550, estimated to be 22 $10,000,000, from the International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)). 23 (i) If federal receipts are temporarily insufficient to cover international airports 24 system project expenditures approved for funding with those receipts, the amount necessary to 25 prevent that cash deficiency, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the 26 International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 27 2027, contingent on repayment to the general fund, as soon as additional federal receipts have 28 been received by the state for that purpose. 29 (j) The amount of federal receipts deposited in the International Airports Revenue 30 Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) necessary to reimburse the general fund for international airports 31 system project expenditures, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the International 01 Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) to the general fund. 02 (k) The amount necessary for payment of obligations and fees for the Goose Creek 03 Correctional Center, estimated to be $16,840,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the 04 Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 05 (l) The amount necessary, estimated to be $41,636,643, is appropriated to the 06 Department of Education and Early Development for state aid for costs of school construction 07 under AS 14.11.100 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the following sources: 08 (1) $9,600,000 from the School Fund (AS 43.50.140); 09 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 10 subsection, estimated to be $32,036,643, from the general fund. 11 * Sec. 35. FEDERAL AND OTHER PROGRAM RECEIPTS. (a) Federal receipts, 12 designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3), information services fund program 13 receipts under AS 44.21.045(b), Exxon Valdez oil spill trust receipts under 14 AS 37.05.146(b)(4), receipts of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, receipts of the 15 Alaska marine highway system fund under AS 19.65.060(a), receipts of the University of 16 Alaska under AS 37.05.146(b)(2), receipts of the highways equipment working capital fund 17 under AS 44.68.210, and receipts of commercial fisheries test fishing operations under 18 AS 37.05.146(c)(20) that are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and that 19 exceed the amounts appropriated by this Act are appropriated conditioned on compliance with 20 the program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). Receipts received under this subsection 21 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, do not include the balance of a state fund on 22 June 30, 2026. 23 (b) If federal or other program receipts under AS 37.05.146 and AS 44.21.045(b) that 24 are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, exceed the amounts appropriated by 25 this Act, the appropriations from state funds for the affected program shall be reduced by the 26 excess if the reductions are consistent with applicable federal statutes. 27 (c) If federal or other program receipts under AS 37.05.146 and AS 44.21.045(b) that 28 are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, fall short of the amounts 29 appropriated by this Act, the affected appropriation is reduced by the amount of the shortfall 30 in receipts. 31 (d) The amount of designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) 01 appropriated in this Act includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, 02 of designated program receipts collected under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) for that purpose. 03 (e) Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an appropriation item for the fiscal year 04 ending June 30, 2027, may not be increased under AS 37.07.080(h) based on the Alaska 05 Gasline Development Corporation's receipt of additional 06 (1) federal receipts; or 07 (2) statutory designated program receipts. 08 * Sec. 36. FUND CAPITALIZATION. (a) The portions of the fees listed in this subsection 09 that are collected during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $16,000, are 10 appropriated to the Alaska children's trust grant account (AS 37.14.205(a)): 11 (1) fees collected under AS 18.50.225, less the cost of supplies, for the 12 issuance of heirloom birth certificates; 13 (2) fees collected under AS 18.50.272, less the cost of supplies, for the 14 issuance of heirloom marriage certificates; 15 (3) fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d) for the issuance of special request 16 Alaska children's trust license plates, less the cost of issuing the license plates. 17 (b) The amount of federal receipts received for disaster relief during the fiscal year 18 ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $9,000,000, is appropriated to the disaster relief fund 19 (AS 26.23.300(a)). 20 (c) The sum of $48,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the disaster relief 21 fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 22 (d) Twenty-five percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b), estimated 23 to be $233,525, is appropriated to the dividend raffle fund (AS 43.23.230(a)). 24 (e) The amount of municipal bond bank receipts determined under AS 44.85.270(h) to 25 be available for transfer by the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority for the fiscal year 26 ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $0, is appropriated to the Alaska municipal bond bank 27 authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)). 28 (f) If the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority must draw on the Alaska municipal 29 bond bank authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)) because of a default by a borrower, an 30 amount equal to the amount drawn from the reserve is appropriated from the general fund to 31 the Alaska municipal bond bank authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)). 01 (g) The amount necessary, estimated to be $1,271,451,445, when added to the balance 02 of the public education fund (AS 14.17.300) on June 30, 2026, to fund the total amount for the 03 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, of state aid calculated under the public school funding 04 formula under AS 14.17.410(b) is appropriated to the public education fund (AS 14.17.300) 05 from the following sources: 06 (1) $36,649,565 from the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)); 07 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 08 subsection, estimated to be $1,234,801,880, from the general fund. 09 (h) The amount necessary to fund transportation of students under AS 14.09.010 for 10 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $72,826,112, is appropriated from the 11 general fund to the public education fund (AS 14.17.300). 12 (i) The sum of $19,603,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the regional 13 educational attendance area and small municipal school district school fund 14 (AS 14.11.030(a)). 15 (j) The amount necessary to pay medical insurance premiums for eligible surviving 16 dependents under AS 39.60.040 and the costs of the Department of Public Safety associated 17 with administering the peace officer and firefighter survivors' fund (AS 39.60.010) for the 18 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $60,000, is appropriated from the general 19 fund to the peace officer and firefighter survivors' fund (AS 39.60.010) for that purpose. 20 (k) The amount of federal receipts awarded or received for capitalization of the 21 Alaska clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, less 22 the amount expended for administering the loan fund and other eligible activities, estimated to 23 be $26,461,500, is appropriated from federal receipts to the Alaska clean water fund 24 (AS 46.03.032(a)). 25 (l) The amount necessary to match federal receipts awarded or received for 26 capitalization of the Alaska clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) during the fiscal year ending 27 June 30, 2027, estimated to be $5,037,700, is appropriated to the Alaska clean water fund 28 (AS 46.03.032(a)) from the following sources: 29 (1) the amount available for appropriation from Alaska clean water fund 30 revenue bond receipts, estimated to be $2,088,900; 31 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 01 subsection, not to exceed $2,948,800, from the general fund. 02 (m) The amount of federal receipts awarded or received for capitalization of the 03 Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 04 less the amount expended for administering the loan fund and other eligible activities, 05 estimated to be $35,353,500, is appropriated from federal receipts to the Alaska drinking 06 water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)). 07 (n) The amount necessary to match federal receipts awarded or received for 08 capitalization of the Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) during the fiscal year 09 ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $7,160,800, is appropriated to the Alaska drinking 10 water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) from the following sources: 11 (1) the amount available for appropriation from Alaska drinking water fund 12 revenue bond receipts, estimated to be $2,181,200; 13 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 14 subsection, not to exceed $4,979,600, from the general fund. 15 (o) The amount received under AS 18.67.162 as program receipts, estimated to be 16 $85,000, including donations and recoveries of or reimbursement for awards made from the 17 crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162), during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 18 is appropriated to the crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162). 19 (p) The sum of $1,005,480 is appropriated from that portion of the dividend fund 20 (AS 43.23.045(a)) that would have been paid to individuals who are not eligible to receive a 21 permanent fund dividend because of a conviction or incarceration under AS 43.23.005(d) to 22 the crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162) for the purposes of the crime victim 23 compensation fund (AS 18.67.162). 24 (q) An amount equal to the interest earned on amounts in the election fund required 25 by the federal Help America Vote Act, estimated to be $250,000, is appropriated to the 26 election fund for use in accordance with 52 U.S.C. 21004(b)(2). 27 (r) The vaccine assessment program receipts collected under AS 18.09.220 during the 28 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $20,000,000, are appropriated to the vaccine 29 assessment fund (AS 18.09.230). 30 (s) The sum of $50,000,000 is appropriated to the community assistance fund 31 (AS 29.60.850) from the following sources: 01 (1) the amount available for appropriation under AS 42.45.085(d), after the 02 appropriation made in sec. 22(e) of this Act, estimated to be $4,801,970, from the power cost 03 equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)); and 04 (2) the remaining amount, estimated to be $45,198,030, from the general fund. 05 (t) The amount necessary, estimated to be $26,000,000, for fire suppression activities 06 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to the fire suppression fund 07 (AS 41.15.210) from the following sources: 08 (1) $20,500,000 from federal receipts; 09 (2) $500,000 from interagency receipts; and 10 (3) $5,000,000 from statutory designated program receipts. 11 (u) The sum of $60,600,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the fire 12 suppression fund (AS 41.15.210). 13 * Sec. 37. FUND TRANSFERS. (a) The federal funds received by the state under 42 U.S.C. 14 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, after the 15 appropriations made for grants under AS 37.05.530(d) that take effect in the fiscal year 16 ending June 30, 2026, are appropriated as follows: 17 (1) 25 percent to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund (art. IX, sec. 15, 18 Constitution of the State of Alaska); 19 (2) 70 percent to the regional educational attendance area and small municipal 20 school district school fund (AS 14.11.030); 21 (3) .5 percent to the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)); and 22 (4) 4.5 percent to the power cost equalization endowment fund 23 (AS 42.45.070(a)). 24 (b) An amount equal to 10 percent of the filing fees received by the Alaska Court 25 System during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be $306,380, is appropriated 26 from the general fund to the civil legal services fund (AS 37.05.590) for the purpose of 27 making appropriations from the fund to organizations that provide civil legal services to low- 28 income individuals. 29 (c) An amount equal to 15 percent of the filing fees received by the Alaska Court 30 System during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be $459,500, is appropriated 31 from the general fund to the civil legal services fund (AS 37.05.590) for the purpose of 01 making appropriations from the fund to organizations that provide civil legal services to low- 02 income individuals. 03 (d) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, estimated to be 04 $2,000,000, of the Alaska clean water administrative income account (AS 46.03.034(a)(2)) in 05 the Alaska clean water administrative fund (AS 46.03.034) is appropriated to the Alaska clean 06 water administrative operating account (AS 46.03.034(a)(1)) in the Alaska clean water 07 administrative fund (AS 46.03.034). 08 (e) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, estimated to be 09 $1,000,000, of the Alaska drinking water administrative income account (AS 46.03.038(a)(2)) 10 in the Alaska drinking water administrative fund (AS 46.03.038) is appropriated to the Alaska 11 drinking water administrative operating account (AS 46.03.038(a)(1)) in the Alaska drinking 12 water administrative fund (AS 46.03.038). 13 (f) An amount equal to the interest earned on amounts in the special aviation fuel tax 14 account (AS 43.40.010(e)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to the 15 special aviation fuel tax account (AS 43.40.010(e)). 16 (g) An amount equal to the revenue collected from the following sources during the 17 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $1,318,000, is appropriated to the fish and 18 game fund (AS 16.05.100): 19 (1) range fees collected at shooting ranges operated by the Department of Fish 20 and Game (AS 16.05.050(a)(15)), estimated to be $500,000; 21 (2) receipts from the sale of waterfowl conservation stamp limited edition 22 prints (AS 16.05.826(a)), estimated to be $3,000; 23 (3) fees collected for sanctuary access permits (AS 16.05.050(a)(15)), 24 estimated to be $125,000; and 25 (4) fees collected at hunter, boating, and angling access sites managed by the 26 Department of Natural Resources, division of parks and outdoor recreation, under a 27 cooperative agreement authorized under AS 16.05.050(a)(6), estimated to be $690,000. 28 (h) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 37.14.820 for the fiscal 29 year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $30,000, is appropriated from the mine 30 reclamation trust fund income account (AS 37.14.800(a)) to the mine reclamation trust fund 31 operating account (AS 37.14.800(a)). 01 (i) Twenty-five percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b), estimated to 02 be $233,525, is appropriated to the education endowment fund (AS 43.23.220). 03 (j) The unexpended and unobligated balance of the large passenger vessel gaming and 04 gambling tax account (AS 43.35.220) on June 30, 2027, estimated to be $30,439,000, is 05 appropriated to the general fund. 06 (k) The proceeds received from the sale of Alaska marine highway system assets 07 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, are appropriated to the Alaska marine highway 08 system vessel replacement fund (AS 37.05.550). 09 (l) The sum of $5,265,885 is appropriated from the general fund to the renewable 10 energy grant fund (AS 42.45.045). 11 (m) The amount received by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education as 12 repayment for WWAMI medical education program loans, estimated to be $425,000, is 13 appropriated to the Alaska higher education investment fund (AS 37.14.750). 14 (n) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 15 prevention account (AS 46.08.010(a)(1)) in the oil and hazardous substance release 16 prevention and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the sources indicated: 17 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 18 mitigation account (AS 46.08.020(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2026, estimated to be 19 $1,528,300, not otherwise appropriated by this Act; 20 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to 21 be $6,080,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.300; and 22 (3) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to 23 be $6,100,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.40.005. 24 (o) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 25 response account (AS 46.08.010(a)(2)) in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 26 and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the following sources: 27 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release response mitigation 28 account (AS 46.08.025(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2026, estimated to be $700,000, 29 not otherwise appropriated by this Act; and 30 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to 31 be $1,520,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.201. 01 (p) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 02 prevention account (AS 46.08.010(a)(1)) in the oil and hazardous substance release 03 prevention and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the sources indicated: 04 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 05 mitigation account (AS 46.08.020(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2027, estimated to be 06 $1,528,300, not otherwise appropriated by this Act; 07 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to 08 be $6,640,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.300; and 09 (3) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to 10 be $7,100,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.40.005. 11 (q) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 12 response account (AS 46.08.010(a)(2)) in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 13 and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the following sources: 14 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release response mitigation 15 account (AS 46.08.025(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2027, estimated to be $700,000, 16 not otherwise appropriated by this Act; and 17 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to 18 be $1,660,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.201. 19 * Sec. 38. RETIREMENT SYSTEM FUNDING. (a) The sum of $106,323,000 is 20 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Administration for deposit in the 21 defined benefit plan account in the public employees' retirement system as an additional state 22 contribution under AS 39.35.280 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 23 (b) The sum of $163,926,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department 24 of Administration for deposit in the defined benefit plan account in the teachers' retirement 25 system as an additional state contribution under AS 14.25.085 for the fiscal year ending 26 June 30, 2027. 27 (c) The sum of $1,436,710 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 28 Administration to pay benefit payments to eligible members and survivors of eligible 29 members earned under the elected public officers' retirement system for the fiscal year ending 30 June 30, 2027. 31 * Sec. 39. SALARY AND BENEFIT ADJUSTMENTS. (a) The operating budget 01 appropriations made in secs. 1 and 30 of this Act include amounts for salary and benefit 02 adjustments for public officials, officers, and employees of the executive branch, Alaska 03 Court System employees, employees of the legislature, and legislators and to implement the 04 monetary terms for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, of the following ongoing collective 05 bargaining agreements: 06 (1) Public Employees Local 71, for the labor, trades, and crafts unit; 07 (2) Alaska Public Employees Association, for the supervisory unit; 08 (3) Teachers' Education Association of Mt. Edgecumbe, representing the 09 teachers of Mt. Edgecumbe High School; 10 (4) Alaska Vocational Technical Center Teachers' Association, National 11 Education Association, representing the employees of the Alaska Vocational Technical 12 Center; 13 (5) International Organization of Masters, Mates, and Pilots, representing the 14 masters, mates, and pilots unit; 15 (6) Alaska State Employees Association, for the general government unit; 16 (7) Marine Engineers' Beneficial Association, representing licensed engineers 17 employed by the Alaska marine highway system; 18 (8) Confidential Employees Association, representing the confidential unit; 19 (9) Inlandboatmen's Union of the Pacific, Alaska Region, representing the 20 unlicensed marine unit; 21 (10) Alaska Correctional Officers Association, representing the correctional 22 officers unit; 23 (11) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 24 commissioned public safety officers unit members within the Department of Transportation 25 and Public Facilities; 26 (12) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 27 commissioned public safety officers unit members within the Department of Public Safety. 28 (b) The operating budget appropriations made to the University of Alaska in sec. 1 of 29 this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments to implement the monetary terms 30 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, of the following collective bargaining agreements: 31 (1) Alaska Graduate Workers Association/UAW; 01 (2) United Academics - American Association of University Professors, 02 American Federation of Teachers; 03 (3) United Academic - Adjuncts - American Association of University 04 Professors, American Federation of Teachers; 05 (4) Alaska Higher Education Crafts and Trades Employees, Local 6070; 06 (5) Fairbanks Firefighters Union, IAFF Local 1324. 07 (c) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (a) of this section is not ratified by 08 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit, the appropriations made in this 09 Act applicable to the collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by 10 the amount for that collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source 11 amounts are adjusted accordingly. 12 (d) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (b) of this section is not ratified by 13 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit and approved by the Board of 14 Regents of the University of Alaska, the appropriations made in this Act applicable to the 15 collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by the amount for that 16 collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source amounts are adjusted 17 accordingly. 18 * Sec. 40. SHARED TAXES AND FEES. (a) An amount equal to the salmon enhancement 19 tax collected under AS 43.76.001 - 43.76.028 in calendar year 2025, estimated to be 20 $4,858,000, and deposited in the general fund under AS 43.76.025(c), is appropriated from 21 the general fund to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 22 for payment in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to qualified regional associations 23 operating within a region designated under AS 16.10.375. 24 (b) An amount equal to the seafood development tax collected under AS 43.76.350 - 25 43.76.399 in calendar year 2025, estimated to be $2,278,000, and deposited in the general 26 fund under AS 43.76.380(d), is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 27 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment in the fiscal year ending 28 June 30, 2027, to qualified regional seafood development associations for the following 29 purposes: 30 (1) promotion of seafood and seafood byproducts that are harvested in the 31 region and processed for sale; 01 (2) promotion of improvements to the commercial fishing industry and 02 infrastructure in the seafood development region; 03 (3) establishment of education, research, advertising, or sales promotion 04 programs for seafood products harvested in the region; 05 (4) preparation of market research and product development plans for the 06 promotion of seafood and seafood byproducts that are harvested in the region and processed 07 for sale; 08 (5) cooperation with the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute and other public 09 or private boards, organizations, or agencies engaged in work or activities similar to the work 10 of the organization, including entering into contracts for joint programs of consumer 11 education, sales promotion, quality control, advertising, and research in the production, 12 processing, or distribution of seafood harvested in the region; 13 (6) cooperation with commercial fishermen, fishermen's organizations, 14 seafood processors, the Alaska Fisheries Development Foundation, the Fishery Industrial 15 Technology Center, state and federal agencies, and other relevant persons and entities to 16 investigate market reception to new seafood product forms and to develop commodity 17 standards and future markets for seafood products. 18 (c) An amount equal to the dive fishery management assessment collected under 19 AS 43.76.150 - 43.76.210 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be 20 $300,000 and deposited in the general fund, is appropriated from the general fund to the 21 Department of Fish and Game for payment in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to the 22 qualified regional dive fishery development association in the administrative area where the 23 assessment was collected. 24 (d) The amount necessary to refund to local governments and other entities their share 25 of taxes and fees collected in the listed fiscal years under the following programs is 26 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Revenue for payment to local 27 governments and other entities in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 28 FISCAL YEAR ESTIMATED 29 REVENUE SOURCE COLLECTED AMOUNT 30 Fisheries business tax (AS 43.75) 2026 $20,903,000 31 Fishery resource landing tax (AS 43.77) 2026 5,014,000 01 Electric and telephone cooperative tax 2027 4,408,000 02 (AS 10.25.570) 03 Liquor license fee (AS 04.11) 2027 785,000 04 Cost recovery fisheries (AS 16.10.455) 2027 0 05 (e) The amount necessary to refund to local governments the full amount of an 06 aviation fuel tax or surcharge collected under AS 43.40 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 07 2027, estimated to be $175,000, is appropriated from the proceeds of the aviation fuel tax or 08 surcharge levied under AS 43.40 to the Department of Revenue for that purpose. 09 (f) The amount necessary to pay the first seven ports of call their share of the tax 10 collected under AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2026, according to AS 43.52.230(b), estimated 11 to be $31,014,000, is appropriated from the commercial vessel passenger tax account 12 (AS 43.52.230(a)) to the Department of Revenue for payment to the ports of call for the fiscal 13 year ending June 30, 2027. 14 (g) If the amount in the commercial vessel passenger tax account (AS 43.52.230(a)) 15 that is derived from the tax collected under AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2026 is less than 16 the amount necessary to pay the first seven ports of call their share of the tax collected under 17 AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2026, according to AS 43.52.230(b), the appropriation made in 18 (f) of this section shall be reduced in proportion to the amount of the shortfall. 19 * Sec. 41. RATIFICATION OF SMALL AMOUNTS IN STATE ACCOUNTING. The 20 appropriation to each department under this Act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is 21 reduced to reverse negative account balances in amounts of $1,000 or less for the department 22 in the state accounting system for each prior fiscal year in which a negative account balance 23 of $1,000 or less exists. 24 * Sec. 42. CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. (a) Deposits in the budget 25 reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska) for fiscal year 2026 that are 26 made from subfunds and accounts of the operating general fund by operation of art. IX, sec. 27 sec. 17(d), Constitution of the State of Alaska, to repay appropriations from the budget 28 reserve fund are appropriated from the budget reserve fund to the subfunds and accounts from 29 which those funds were transferred. 30 (b) The appropriation made from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, 31 Constitution of the State of Alaska) in (a) of this section is made under art. IX, sec. 17(c), 01 Constitution of the State of Alaska. 02 * Sec. 43. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. The appropriations made in secs. 10, 11, 18(a), 03 (b), and (d) - (f), 19(d), 21(c) - (e), 26(f), 34(b), (c), and (i), 36, 37(a) - (i) and (k) - (q), and 04 38(a) and (b) of this Act are for the capitalization of funds and do not lapse. 05 * Sec. 44. RETROACTIVITY. (a) The appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act that 06 appropriate either the unexpended and unobligated balance of specific fiscal year 2026 07 program receipts or the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of a specified 08 account are retroactive to June 30, 2026, solely for the purpose of carrying forward a prior 09 fiscal year balance. 10 (b) Sections 5 - 11 of this Act are retroactive to May 20, 2026. 11 (c) Sections 12, 13, and 37(n) and (o) of this Act are retroactive to June 30, 2026. 12 (d) Sections 1 - 4, 14 - 36, 37(a) - (m), 38 - 43, and 45 of this Act are retroactive to 13 July 1, 2026. 14 * Sec. 45. CONTINGENCIES. (a) The appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act for the 15 payment of a bonus to an employee in the executive branch of the state government who is a 16 member of a collective bargaining unit established under the authority of AS 23.40.070 - 17 23.40.260 (Public Employment Relations Act) but for which the state and applicable 18 bargaining unit of the employee have not yet entered into a letter of agreement under 19 AS 23.40.070 - 23.40.260 are contingent on the following: 20 (1) the state and the applicable bargaining unit of the employee entering into a 21 letter of agreement under AS 23.40.070 - 23.40.260 for the bonus; and 22 (2) the Office of the Governor, office of management and budget, satisfying 23 the requirements of sec. 20(b)(1) of this Act. 24 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 32 of this Act is contingent on the National 25 Science Foundation awarding a grant in calendar year 2026 to an entity in the state for the 26 purpose of creating and operating a critical mineral accelerator program in the state in 27 collaboration with the University of Alaska Fairbanks Geophysical Institute Alaska Critical 28 Minerals Collaborative. 29 (c) The appropriation made in sec. 37(c) of this Act is contingent on passage by the 30 Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature and enactment into law of a version of House Bill 48 31 or a similar bill. 01 * Sec. 46. Sections 5 - 11 and 44 of this Act take effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 02 * Sec. 47. Sections 12, 13, and 37(n) and (o) of this Act take effect June 30, 2026. 03 * Sec. 48. Sections 37(p) and (q) of this Act take effect June 30, 2027. 04 * Sec. 49. Except as provided in secs. 46 - 48 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.